       Essays on child pornography and sex trafficking, mind control,
   secret societies, ritual abuse, psychiatric abuse, government
   programming, the Nazi UFO hoax, grey aliens and MKULTRA from the
   survivor's perspective. All accusations are alleged.

                      [moon%20and%20venus%20small.jpg]

                                  My Story:

                             Walpurgisnacht Baby

                              Child Pornography

                               Satanic Ritual

                        Psychiatric Abuse and MKULTRA

                          Cults and Organized Crime

                      [moon%20and%20venus%20small.jpg]

                              Survivor Essays:

                          Grey Aliens and Nazi UFOs

                                Mind Control

                                 Armageddon

                       Ritual and The Ten Commandments

                   Nazi Physics versus Newton and Einstein

                      Science: A Study in Good and Evil

                          Brain Chemistry and Drugs

                    Neurofeedback an article by Sue Ford

                             From My Perspective

                      [moon%20and%20venus%20small.jpg]

                                Email: mauri

                               Links and Books
     [Moon%20and%20Venus%20photo.jpg]

                       Is America Asleep at the Wheel?

     The road cloaked in darkness pulls us this way and that, while we all
    blissfully slumber. As the world arms toward a destiny few are aware
     of, will we be able to put on the breaks in time to avoid World War
    III?  Our heroes, all persons of trust, protect us good children from
   the truth, which is too horrible to be viewed.  So turn out the light,
     censor the facts, make it palatable, show only the roses, never the
       thorns. When the dream turns to nightmare, well it was really a
                   nightmare all along.  Time to wake up!



    "Again, the devil taketh him up into an exceeding high mountain, and
    showth him all the kingdoms of the world, and the glory of them;  And
    saith unto him.  All these things will I give thee, if thou wilt fall
                down and worship me."      St. Matthew 4:8-9

     Is it part of the Illuminati Plan that the Pope should accept what
                               Jesus refused?

    "Moslem and Jewish areas in Jerusalem will be combined with Christian
    to create the New Jerusalem Covenant. Then, and only then, will it be
     possible to build a combination Temple/Church/Mosque in Jerusalem."
     "At the proper moment in history, the Pope will visit the combined
      Jewish/Christian/Moslem sector of Jerusalem to announce that all
    religions should be combined into one. This action will then finally
      break the Middle East logjam."  Wording from the Illuminati Plan.

     "And the smoke of their torment ascendeth up for ever and ever: and
    they have no rest day nor night, who worship the beast and his image,
     and whosoever receiveth the mark of his name."     Revelation 14:11

                "Ye shall know the truth, and the truth shall
                         make you free."   John 8:32


   [reflections-cover.jpg]


   Reflections in the Night: A Survivor's Story of Total Mind Controlled
   Slavery and Torture

   A 320 Page Paperback Book





                              Radio Interviews


   I wish to thank Greg Szymanski of the Investigative Journal and Arctic
   Beacon, Zeph Daniel of the Zeph Report, and Vyzygoth of Vyzygoth's
   Grassy Knoll for their support in putting out those stories that are
   uncomfortable to listen to and therefore often ignored.  Anecdotal
   reporting of hidden history is sometimes all there is folks.  The
   following are Patriot Radio Interviews with Mauri.

   Greg Szymanski Feb 15  [Part 1]  [Part 2]  [Feb 17]  [June 6]  [Oct
   13]  2006

   Zeph Daniel  Mar 21  [Part 1]  [Part 2]  2006

   Vyzygoth  [Aug 16]  2006

   Interview with Adam Gorightly, Untamed Dimensions, [May 29] 2007


   [Bookcover-Vatican_Ratline.jpg]



   Vatican Ratline: The Vatican, the Nazis and the New World Order

   A 148 Page Paperback Book






                                 [rant.jpg]

   [moon%20and%20venus%20small.jpg]


                             The Moonlight Rant

                       Blog



   July 9, 2012

Love of Nature


   [spider%20web.jpg] When I moved into my home it was near perfect.  My
   grassy yards, surrounded by barked beds, were filled with beautiful
   plants.  On all sides were huge, I mean scary tall, trees, all that
   remained of the lumber industry.  But, just below the surface of my
   land lay a secret.  The foundation of my lot was rocks and sand fill,
   with little topsoil.  If I planted in the barked beds nothing grew.  I
   began to fill in areas with bagged topsoil, manure and mulch so I could
   add new plants.  But in every area I tried to grow vegetables I was met
   with failure.  Over time, a lot of time, the bark finally broke down.
   It was then that IT made its first ominous appearance.  Buttercup, a
   nitrogen-fixing weed, had arrived.  And Buttercup was here to stay.
   Try as I may I couldn’t get rid of it.  I pulled the weeds out, put
   them in piles to decompose as mulch and the piles grew more Buttercup.
   Even the rabbits wouldn’t eat it.  My deeply shaded yard was the
   perfect medium.  The horrible weeds were everywhere.  My neighbors
   complained.  I made more piles and more Buttercup grew.  They wanted me
   to clean it all out so my yard was pristine like theirs.  But I was
   determined to keep every bit of yard waste composting so that I could
   grow more flowers.  And my flowers did grow along with the weeds.  Soon
   my yard was green everywhere with weeds everywhere.  When I removed the
   weeds to plant something else, I found something new, Topsoil.  Beds
   that wouldn’t support an annual plant before would now grow
   vegetables.  Why not turn Buttercup into potatoes, squash and beans.
   Well, why not?  Maybe Mother Nature does know best. So I have decided
   to love the Buttercup that feeds the grass, that makes the mulch, that
   feeds my gardens.  No chemicals allowed!

   Mauri

   7/9/12


   June 30, 2011

             Two Wolves and A Sheep Vote on What’s For Dinner


   [Two%20Wolves%20and%20Lamb.jpg] I’m told that in a Direct Democracy 51%
   of the people can vote to steal the property of the other 49%.  That
   sounds bad to me.  I’m for protecting the minority from the tyranny of
   the majority.  On some level, I am a minority, as most people are.  As
   I look at my worsening economic situation, getting out the old
   Constitution and Bill of Rights, dusting it off and at least giving it
   a read seems a prudent thing to do.  Perhaps it is worth keeping, with
   just an adjustment here and there.  But something is seriously wrong.
   The very people we choose to protect our Constitution are trashing it.

    The close to 600 people elected to run the Federal Government, voting
   on laws that I never read, and often they don’t read either, is
   apparently what we have chosen to protect the precious minority, that
   is us.   Hay wait, what is wrong with this picture?  The majority
   required to create new laws is only 0.1% of the people (300/300000.)
   In other words, it doesn’t take 51% of the people to steal from the
   other 49%.  It takes only 0.1% of the people to steel from the other
   99.9%.  And what is worse, we keep re-electing the same bunch of
   thieves. Under this system one has only to corrupt 300 people to rule
   this Country.  Hmmm  A Direct Democracy, where We the People vote for
   the laws, with the courts ready to protect basic human rights, sounds
   to me like a 50,000% improvement over the system we now have.
   Hopefully getting laws passed would be a lot more difficult, giving all
   of us more freedom.

   Mauri

   6/30/11



                    Kissing “Social Security” Good-by


   [basketmaker_small.jpg] Social Security, our love-hate affaire with Big
   Government, is collapsing under the weight of mismanagement beyond
   anyone’s control.  Those shadowy figures, who started it in the first
   place, no longer need Social Security.  Its goal, the breakup of the
   family, has occurred.  It also set up a nice trust fund to later rob;
   mission accomplished.

   Social Security has always been the Really Big Con.  When we came home
   from our jobs, many that supported banking and the military industrial
   complex, we collapsed in front of the mind controlling TV and counted
   our money to feel better.  Our 401Ks grew by the day.  To say that
   Americans didn’t save was a lie.  Every one had a retirement plan that
   they contributed to, some with large sums of money.  America was
   becoming blinded to the real world by greed.  Social Security was the
   first major step into the Big Government casino.  Next we began playing
   Russian roulette with the stock market, just to beat the system
   tax-wise.

   What was all this money for?  Well, it was to pay for warehousing in
   style when we became old.  And becoming old was the only thing most of
   us had to look forward to as we baked in our car on the way to work or
   sat in our cubical when we got there.  Boy did we learn to love our
   money.  It filled in the void with a magical existence that had little
   to do with reality.  Dream Big!  To become warehoused in a
   self-centered dream is not nature’s or God’s plan.

   Did you know that children become automatically bonded by blood alone
   to grandparents, just as they do to parents.  Old people are meant to
   work till they drop in helping to raise and educate the next
   generation. Kicking the grandparents out of the family dealt a major
   blow to its foundation. Welfare programs helped further erode the
   family by kicking the males out.  Social Services is now in the process
   of removing the children.  This evil would be a lot harder to do if we
   didn’t fund it with tax dollars.

   Life is a series of consequences.  Now that the family, we thought we
   didn’t need and certainly didn’t appreciate, is dead and buried, the
   loss of all that government money is going to be painful!!

   Mauri

   8/28/10


                             Poisoning our Food


   [bread.jpg] Local ethnic food is prepared from what grows in the area
   where you live.  I live in the Pacific Northwest.  In the last few
   years I have been on a quest to grow some of my own food, avoiding the
   poisons put in commercial products.  If I can’t grow it, I buy it in
   bulk and prepare it from scratch. What I have discovered is that a lot
   of stuff doesn’t grow here.  But some really good food does well in
   this area, such as potatoes, soup beans, squash, apples, blue berries
   and a number of grains.  Even a few kinds of tomatoes do well.  I am
   now in the process of compiling some Pacific Northwest Ethnic Food
   Recipes developed in my kitchen.  The Internet is teaching me to cook,
   dehydrate food and farm.  The videos on www.breadtopia.com give
   detailed instruction for a no knead bread like the 5-Grain Indian
   Bread, pictured above.  Four of the five grains grow in my backyard,
   Indian corn, buckwheat, hulless oats and Black Ethiopian barley.  The
   fifth grain grows in my State, whole-wheat pastry flour (similar to
   whole grain spelt flour.)  For complete nutrition I can serve it with
   Yellow Indian Woman soup beans grown in my garden and whipped up with
   just water in my crock-pot, delicious even without seasoning.   May
   this inspire anyone reading this blog to do like-wise.  When they
   finally get around to laying you off, maybe one of you should stay home
   to help grow food, prepare it from scratch, sow clothing, knit
   sweaters, build things and home school the kids.  Take a giant step
   backwards to the family and the local community, where the chicken in
   every pot comes from the hen house just outside or just down the
   street.  Get out of the slave-grid nightmare you are in, start doing
   things for yourself and living the true American dream.

   Mauri

   8/8/10


   Bush Buys Land in Northern Paraguay, Birthplace of Communism


   [JesuitFather.jpg]

   The Bush family loves The United States so they have purchased secluded
   land to the South.  Perhaps they desire a greater closeness with secret
   friends.

    www.thetruthseeker.co.uk/article.asp?id=5324

   Martin Bormann, Doctor Josef Mengele, Heinrich Mueller, famous Nazis
   all, also found sanctuary in Paraguay.



Martin Bormann: Nazi in Exile - PDF


   What’s up with the Nazis, the Globalists and Paraguay?

   Well, for one thing it is the home of the original Communist
   experiment, brought to conquered land in South American by the Catholic
   Church and their hit men, the Jesuit Order.  Did you know that their
   Communist Manifesto had a Constitution?     Before you join the Nazis,
   Bush and the Jesuits as loyal Communists, which is all the rage on the
   Left, perhaps you should read that Constitution.  It is found in the
   following ebook, Chapter XVII, “The Constitution of the Reductions.”


   In Jesuit Land: The Jesuit Missions of Paraguay - PDF


   Download, read these books and find out what’s up with Paraguay.

     [Reducciones.jpg]

   Mauri

   5/15/10



               We are Seed, Fruit, Tuber, Root and Meat Eaters

   [fowl.jpg] The Three Sisters combination of foods, grown by Native
   Americans, of corn, beans and squash, are two seeds and a fruit.  The
   combination of pulse and grains, eaten all over the world, is a mixture
   of seeds.  “Oats, peas, beans and barley grow” eaten by European
   Americans is a mixture of seeds.  When growing a garden to create
   self-sufficiency the focus should be on these food items.  Salads are a
   luxury or treat.  They should not be even close to one’s main source of
   nutrition.  One would have to eat 26 pounds of Romaine lettuce to get
   2000 calories.  Fruits contain sugars to nurture the seeds they also
   contain.  Leaves contain cellulose, which is not digested by humans.
   While leaves do supply important nutrients, and some greens should be
   consumed, basically they are a fibrous structure of indigestible
   cellulose.  Humans possess the enzymes to digest starch and sugars, not
   cellulose.

           The government has had an evil hand in the deterioration of our
   health long before genetically modified food.  Who can forget trans fat
   or molecularly modified hydrogenated oil.  It was suppose to be
   healthier than butter.  Except your body didn't know what to do with
   it, so it just collected in your arteries.  Lawns have replaced
   orchards and vegetable gardens. Fruit bearing trees have all but
   disappeared from our cities and suburbs, being replaced by trees that
   flower, but don't drop "messy" fruit. When I was pregnant with my
   daughter, the Obstetrician put me on a diet of lettuce with the stated
   goal being a low birth weight baby.  The reasoning was that a small
   baby is easy to deliver.  Fortunately for my daughter, I take orders
   poorly.   The government push against quality foods for the public goes
   back to at least the 1950’s. Just look at the Popeye cartoons with its
   lie that spinach is a good source of energy.  Popeye portrays
   everything backwards, including the relative proportions of his arm.
   Not a good source for advice.  Next the government lies continued with
   “cholesterol” and they went on to demonize eggs.  If the governments of
   the world could only get rid of eggs, populations would be easier to
   manage because people would be less self-sufficient.  But isn’t that
   what the bird flu hoax was all about, slaughtering the peasant’s
   chickens?   With the new ObamaCare beware of a push to force the public
   on a diet of indigestible cellulose leaves and have them call it good
   nutrition, while they demonize foods containing sugars, starch and
   proteins, such as seeds, fruit, tuber, root, meat and eggs.

   Mauri

   3/28/10



   [dove%20and%20olive.jpg]

   The End Justifies the Means

    Such a statement is pure fallacy.  To begin with there is no End.  The
   Means in all our lives is how we live daily.  Our final judgment will
   be of the Means.  As we all face this most desperate time of a New
   World Order, salvation lies in the Means.  It is in this area of my own
   life that I fight.

   Today it is raining and chilly, but I have strawberries coming that
   must go into the ground.  So I brave the weather and the ache in my
   bones to dig in the soil, because that is the means I have chosen.  And
   the most important issue is the Means, not some distant End that may or
   may not result in strawberries.  If next summer I am blessed with
   succulent fruit I will give God his due in a prayer of gratitude, and
   the cycle continues.  My life is the Means over and over again.  That
   Means has another name, it is called Culture and it is what helps us
   survive.  The Means is what shapes us.  A Means that includes
   generosity and kindness creates a person that you like.  Not liking
   yourself is a curse.

   So where would the statement that “the end justifies the means” come
   from?  If you investigate this philosophy it is steeped in a criminal
   culture.  Some distant “end’ that never materializes justifies criminal
   behavior.  A secretive criminal culture grows and begins feeding on the
   labor of others.  To what end, to feed some more, because that is their
   culture.  To avoid being victims of strangers, it must become our
   culture to take care of our families, our communities and ourselves.
   We need to know personally the people we depend on, and not rely on
   some distant corrupt government agency.  The main problem with a world
   hierarchy is that everyone is lost in a sea of strangers, the most
   vicious of whom struggle to be at the top.

   In my own personal religious beliefs, no man steps between me and my
   relationship with God.  This philosophy has served me well for a
   lifetime and I do not intend to change it.  I could never support the
   one-world religion, the promised “end” of the New World Order that
   supposedly will bring “Peace”.  A criminal culture can never bring
   peace because such a concept is not a part of their Means.

    Mauri 11/15/2009


                            God’s Warm Embrace

   [yakcc.jpg]

   This weekend I went to the University of Washington to participate in
   the First Nations’ celebrations.  I say participate because, unlike the
   Green get-together with their Nazi Green-shirts, I was warmly included.
   The audience was full of out-of-control children, babies laughing and
   silver streaked old people all standing tall with pride.  Everyone
   shared in God’s warm embrace.  As my heart beat to the drums and my
   eyes danced among the eagle feathers, I was re-awakened to the meaning
   of being.  I was reminded of a similar celebration I attended as a
   child at Vasa Park.  The eagle feathers were the colorfully decorated
   pants, skirts and shirts of the Scandinavians.  Then I thought of
   similar celebrations the world over.  One of the very worst things the
   Globalists are doing is not robbing us of our money, but our culture.
   We can survive without money, but without culture, I’m not so sure.

    Mauri 4/12/09


                               It’s Amazing,

     [rainforest.jpg]

   Last weekend I went to the Green Festival to hear Amy Goodman and bask
   in the organic and hemp products.  The room where the presenters were
   to speak quickly filled.  The ritual began.  Sober zombies in green
   shirts guided everyone to their place.  No one spoke.  There were no
   interruptions to the presenters only standing ovations, even though the
   subjects included such controversial topics as National Health Care.
   We were all to get it and love it, like it or not.  I didn’t make it
   through much beyond that point.  On the fifth use of the phrase “Its
   Amazing” I stood, grabbed my stuff and fled the room.  What do those
   buzz words mean?  What’s amazing?  My mother used to say, “It’s just
   tremendous” when referring to things not mentioned.  I shook in anger
   of unknown origin, my head filling with images of the audience
   disrobing and donning black robes, as I looked for a recycle bin to
   throw their literature in.  I really can’t support any group that
   replaces real dialog with buzzwords. Whatever it is that’s amazing, it
   can’t be anything good, or they wouldn’t have had to resort to a
   buzzword.

   My small group didn’t last long at the next exhibit either.  It started
   out nice, with beautiful photos of the rainforest and the beautiful
   people that lived hidden among the trees.  Shocking shots of huge
   machines eating giant holes in the forest floor, exposing the bare
   earth, followed.  The audience was told that they were responsible.  I
   don’t remember condoning the global exploitation of the natural
   resources of so-called “underdeveloped” countries.  Why was the
   behavior the Power Elite my fault?  Why weren’t the global leaders to
   blame?  I know I was at the Green Festival because I have always
   supported leaving a light footprint on my Earth.  The nerve of these
   evil people to ruin my Earth in their greed then say that the mess that
   they leave is my fault.  Well, I for one don’t accept that!

   Mauri  3/ 31/ 09



                    One Picture is Worth a Thousand Words

                    [4443C5FB7266E0EFA4B98DDD422327.jpg]

   Mauri 12/31/08


                                    Socks

   [Psilk-sock.jpg]

   We are told online that the wild ride into depression is beginning.  I
   know this is true because the little shopping malls close to where I
   live are becoming ghost malls.  What I suspect is that all the promised
   goods made in far away places are failing to reach our shores.  Well no
   matter, it turns out much of it is tainted with poisons anyway.  And
   besides, too much of it ends up in the landfills within a short period
   of time.  Psychopaths run the economy we have now, on the backs of
   slave labor. I actually welcome a new economy.  What has this got to do
   with socks?

   My house is full of socks with holes in the soles.  I have always had a
   bad relationship with socks.  I was forced to wear nylons to work that
   ran within days (sometimes hours), caused me heat rashes, felt
   uncomfortable and looked ugly, at least to me.  The packaged socks for
   men and boys now rapidly fall apart and need constant replacing.  Socks
   are the validation of the rot at the center of most mass production.
   Utility, comfort and beauty mean nothing; only money has any real
   value.  And socks, like most of the rest of our mass-produced goods,
   lasts only moments until a new bag of socks is ripped open.

   Food shortages are the obvious fear when the economy finally comes to a
   grinding halt.  But what about socks?  Clothing is high labor in its
   production.  What we have been wearing has endless machine stitching,
   done by human hands.  We have paid next to nothing for it, in order to
   put any local clothing production out of business.  We are about to pay
   dearly for this policy.  I personally don’t want to solve this problem
   by bringing the psychopath industrialists back.  I favor Mom and Pop.
   They would never poison you to make a buck.  Why you might come down
   the street and beat them up.  Production and the community must be
   deeply intertwined if our culture is to survive.

   When I thought about what to do if the dollar crashes and I needed to
   barter, socks were among the first things that came to mind.  I am
   beginning the process of learning to make good wool socks that last,
   among other clothing items.  We can afford to pay the higher price of
   fair wages and profits if an item has longevity.  Things that last stay
   in our closets and don’t end up in landfills.  Mom could even stay home
   and go back to preparing the food and make a least some of the
   clothing.  So far nothing has come close to replacing the traditional
   family in the battle for survival.

   Now will someone out there please learn to make shoes?


   Mauri 12/14/08



                               Election Blahs


   [D36CA75C90739C3B20B788701DFCF5.jpg]

   Blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah,
   blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah.

   I’m afraid my political ignorance is doomed to continue.  The president
   elect I find just as triggering as the one leaving office.  Try as I
   may I don’t believe what they say; it just doesn’t fit what they do.
   The disconnect to my sense of reality mutes their words, blah, blah,
   blah, because actions speak louder.  It disturbs me the glib way the
   sounds roll off their lips all dripping with honey, words backed up by
   Global Might.  I’ve been in this company before, long ago in my
   childhood.  I remember it didn’t go well for me then.  I fear it will
   not go well for me now.

   Mauri  11/06/08


                              October Surprise

   [John_Dillinger.jpg]

   The October Surprise we were all waiting for turned out to be the
   Biggest Bank Heist in History – running into the trillions of dollars.
   Once again the victims were held responsible, something about mortgages
   and lies to innocent banks, which don’t have the time to check the
   validity of loan applications.  Billions in defaults turn into a
   taxpayer bailout measured in trillions.  Oh but they promise to take
   our money and prop up the stock market just to save our retirement
   accounts, well maybe, if they don’t find more interesting things to do
   with the money offshore.  Thank God for electronic accounting, what
   today can be added to the dollars in circulation takes only the stroke
   of a key, unlike yesteryear, which would have required the printing
   presses to run day and night cranking out more and more devalued
   currency.  I wonder if that stroke of a key can wipeout me?  Well not
   to worry about such things. I have a vegetable garden to till, and
   plans for next spring.

   Mauri 10/04/08


                             The Infallible Pope


   [infalible%20pope.jpg]

    The infallible pope is, well, infallible.  Whatever the Vatican and
   the Catholic Church do, the Pope is responsible.  Hindsight of the
   activities of the Church does not give it a pass when it turns out
   evil, such as the torturous murder of heretics.  For the latest in the
   Church’s war on mankind one need look no farther than Blackwater, run
   by the Knights of Malta, out of Malta.

   Knights of Malta run Colorado Air force Academy where the Evangelicals
   are preparing for a holy war against the Moslems. Is it a Vatican goal
   to annihilate both groups as their Heretical beliefs demand? Why is
   America being used to fight the Vatican’s new crusade?  Why are
   American taxpayers funding the Vatican run private army of Blackwater?

   The latest excuse for exposure of mass corruption leading to the
   Church’s door is that Jews have infiltrated the Vatican.  Oh please, by
   definition such a thing is impossible for an infallible Church. If one
   looks closely at the history of the Vatican, not only have the
   doctrines remained consistent (infallible) over time, but also so has
   the violent behavior.

   This corruption is well exposed in the media, main and alternative.
   Please take a moment and educate yourself.

   Blackwater: Knights of Malta in Iraq « Aftermath News

The Schmitz Family - A Key Nazi Connection to 9/11

   http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/content/article/2007/11/02/AR20071
   10202165.html?hpid=topnews


   Mauri 5/04/08


                                Cult Secrets

   [cauldron.jpg] If I said I would reveal to you cult secrets to empower
   your life, would you listen?  No it isn’t knocking on wood twice, spin
   around thrice, while saying abra kadabra. As I think back on how I was
   raised I would have to conclude that the cult knew a few things that
   were not being made public.  My family was a definite social misfit, if
   the gold standard on how to live was what was portrayed in the movies
   and on television.  Today, as I watch old films on DVD, I do notice the
   programming.  Yes, but why the conflict?  The criminal global elites
   were programming both the cults and the general public.  Believe me the
   lessons learned were quite the opposite. The powers-that-be were
   preparing cult members how to survive the economic and medical melt
   down that was being planned for the general public.  We’re not talking
   occult secrets that don’t work, at least as advertised; we’re talking
   hard-core practical measures on survival.

   As I fight what is about to come down next, I find my life-style
   returning to my childhood in many practical ways.  We did operate by
   the “waste not, want not” maximum; we did eat natural foods and take
   vitamins.  I lived by Adel Davis right down to the steamed brains and
   brewers yeast.  I remember cleaning the buckshot out of the brains
   before preparing them.  I found them easier to serve if they were
   whipped in the blender then hidden in a spicy dish. I never did learn
   to eat highly processed food, such as canned soda or margarine.  So
   today I have a little less far to go to clean the toxic waste out of my
   diet than the average American.  Cult members are often taught to
   manage money with extreme frugality, by buying used clothing, sewing
   what you wear or even giving old items to one another.  They often
   purchased by barter. Physical fitness and home crafting were prized
   activities.  When the Witches talk of these skills, which they
   emphasize in their living, they don’t come from witchcraft, but only a
   desire to survive over you.  The general public needs to go back to
   these skills of self-sufficiency, too.  It is the right way to live.
   The more self-sufficient each person, the less susceptible he is to
   predation by criminal Global Powers.

   Mauri (3/2/08)


                                A New Economy

   [tomato.jpg] We all live the “globalist” lifestyle.  And whether we
   like it or not their house of cards is collapsing.  We are about to be
   confronted with a “new economy”.  This is good news and bad depending
   on the public’s response.  The present economy is slowly killing us
   with their poisons and genetically modified this and that.  We try to
   escape and are herded into pastimes of violence, phony news and
   cyber-sex.    Life is becoming more and more depressing and to top it
   all off, we are increasingly becoming sick.  By every parameter we need
   to get this corruption off our back.

   How did we get to this place?  The answer is money.  Corruption bought
   its way into power.  It even bought us.  Or we sold out.  Globalist
   companies who competed unfairly with cheap products replaced local
   commerce.  The public giggled under the weight of this new poisonous
   trash, which soon piled high in the landfills.  The mantra was “buying
   more than you need helps the economy” replacing the age old wisdom of
   “waste not, want not.”  If you were a fully functional human being you
   quickly learned how to dispose of these poor quality items, keeping
   your nest full of new poor quality items and clean.  If somehow you
   retained a small vestige of old wisdom, the trash was stored,
   compartmentalized, stacked and cataloged somewhere in you mind for some
   possible future use.  These people were considered “dysfunctional” as
   that old rusting truck in the side yard was an eye sore.

   In a tight economy, quality becomes important, as does local
   production, as does technical skills not only to build things but also
   to repair them and beyond that, to recycle them.  In a tight economy,
   local labor regains its dignity.  We are forced, if we want to survive,
   to depend on each other rather than some nebulous external Big
   Brother.  Our collapsing economy will test our metal, tapping into how
   clever we really are.  The old morality and pioneer spirit may be
   forced upon us once again.  My first act in preparing myself for a new
   way of life was to turn off the Mafia/CIA controlled television and
   pick up my books on how to grow a vegetable garden or make a quilt.

   Mauri (2/23/08)


                              Do What Thou Wilt

   [Tortured.jpg]

    "Do what thou wilt shall be the whole of the Law." This quote by
   Aleister Crowley states the basis of the religion, Crowleyism.
   Crowleyism is being introduced into our public schools through such
   books as Pullman’s series “His Dark Materials”  found in many public
   school libraries, where they end up being discussed in the curriculum.
   Random House lists The Golden Compass in its selection for teens.
   Included is a “Teachers Guide” which suggests how the book may be
   used.  The teacher is advised to ask the children to consider such
   concepts as betrayal, good vs evil, courage, fear, trust and love, none
   of which was clearly depicted in the stories.  No mention was made to
   discuss the fact that Lyra’s father does a “child sacrifice” of Roger
   to get the power of his life-force, then goes on to become one of the
   story’s heroes.   “Do what thou wilt”  weaves  philosophically through
   the plots of these books on both sides of the  battle, Lyra versus the
   Magistarium.  The books fit well with other school programs that
   introduce Crowleyism, such as kindergarten sex education.  If the new
   state religion is Crowleyism that would explain why books supporting
   the ideas of Crowley are being taught in our public schools.  These
   ideas have a history among the power elite.  To see the motivations of
   the powerful men behind the scenes one need look no farther than some
   of their quotes.

   Dr. G Brock Chisholm in 1945 gave a speech in Washington D.C. to a
   large group of psychiatrists and high government officials, which
   contained the following quote,

     “What basic psychological distortion can be found in every
   civilization of which we know anything? The only psychological force
   capable of producing these perversions is morality--the concept of
   right and wrong. The re-interpretation and eventual eradication of the
   concept of right and wrong are the belated objectives of nearly all
   psychotherapy. If the race is to be freed from its crippling burden of
   good and evil it must be psychiatrists who take the original
   responsibility.”

   The William Alanson White Psychiatric Foundation sponsored the speech.
   Dr. G. Brock Chisholm was first head of the World Federation of Mental
   Health, and later became head of the World Health Organization of the
   United Nations. The motivation behind his ideas may be seen in another
   of his quotes,

   "To achieve world government, it is necessary to remove from the minds
   of men their individualism, loyalty to family tradition, national
   patriotism, and religious dogmas."

   In my view, their goal was not to remove religious dogmas, but in fact
   to introduce religious dogma, by preaching the religion of Crowleyism.
   Aleister Crowley eloquently states his religious views on the subject
   of right and wrong in his book “Magick in Theory and Practice.”   The
   following two quotes, taken from Crowley’s book, are remarkably similar
   in ideology to those of the Psychiatrists, who have enormous influence
   over all of our lives.

   "The Magician should devise for himself a definite technique for
   destroying ‘evil’.  The essence of such a practice will consist in
   training the mind and the body to confront things which cause fear,
   pain, disgust, shame, and the like.  He must learn to endure them, then
   to become indifferent to them, then to analyze them until they give
   pleasure and instruction, and finally to appreciate them for their own
   sake, as aspects of Truth."

   "To attain the Grade of Magister Templi, he must perform two tasks; the
   emancipation from thought by putting each idea against its opposite,
   and refusing to prefer either; and the consecration of himself as a
   pure vehicle for the influence of the order to which he aspires."

   Dr. G. Brock Chisholm seems to have taken his ideas from the teachings
   of Aleister Crowley.  Is the end result of this that Crowleyism is
   being taught in our schools?  How does that fit with our traditions of
   the separation of church and state?  And in practice, as we have
   observed, it is only the state that is allowed to do as it wilt (as
   shown in the photo above).  By the force of the state the citizen must
   comply because whatever the state does, there is no right or wrong,
   only power. Dr. Chishom, Aleister Crowley and now our public school
   systems say so.

   www.randomhouse.com/teens/catalog/display.pperl?isbn=9780440418320&view
   =tg

   Mauri  (2/11/08)


                         His Dark Materials Trilogy

   [London.jpg] Philip Pullman’s “His Dark Materials” Trilogy begins with
   the “The Golden Compass,” moves on to “The Subtle Knife” and ends with
   the “The Amber Spyglass.”  If stories for children are tools in shaping
   their beliefs, this series has a lot to make one ponder what is in
   store for the next generation.  Woven throughout the text is the
   blurring of ideas of opposites, gender confusion and morality
   eradication, just as is done in the writings for adults by Aleister
   Crowley.  In the trilogy, the daemon or soul of each person is of the
   opposite sex.  Lyra, the main character is known by her ability to lie
   even as her golden compass always told the truth.

   The Golden Compass plot ends in pure Satanism. Roger, an innocent
   child, is sacrificed to get his life force in order to cross over into
   a parallel universe.  And Lyra crossed too.  I could hardly move on to
   the next book.  Now we are teaching in our public schools that child
   sacrifice is a good thing, maybe even necessary.  At least Pullman
   believed it was necessary to advance his plot.

   The children move on in the next book, their needs being met by the
   unexplained magic of things just appearing.  No survival skills taught
   here.  To add to the list of “murderers” is Will.  Although the murders
   appear more like unintended accidents, so why call it murder?  Perhaps
   to again blur the lines between right and wrong.  Sometimes murder is
   necessary, as opposed to sometimes accidents happen.  The story line
   continues with the war in heaven interacting with wars on the many
   worlds of the parallel universes.  God dies an incompetent, decrepit
   old man; the fallen angels and the witches defeat the angels of
   heaven.  Lyra is separated from her daemon and becomes more like the
   witches. According to Pullman, wisdom, at least his version of it,
   triumphs over stupidity, freedom wins over oppression.

   Pullmans ends the last book of the trilogy with the goal to build “The
   Republic of Heaven” on Earth. One isn’t sure what he means by that
   until one returns to his description of Heaven (land of the dead), an
   eternity of suffering souls tormented by Harpies.  Judging by his body
   of work, I think that he is talking about building the New World Order
   (land of the mind controlled dead), an eternity of suffering souls
   tormented by Home Land Security.  I think “Republic” was added because
   it sounds good.

               What should stories for children teach, history, science,
   morality, things that the child may apply to his daily life, things
   that will serve him in the future?  Childhood is all about learning.
   Imagination is all about thinking outside the box. I’m not opposed to
   fantasy, but fantasy should stimulate the mind in ways that are
   useful.  It should not teach that the world runs by magic, because it
   doesn’t, or that anything goes, because there are always consequences.
   Pullman's world view, Crowleyism, is a philosophy of slavery not
   freedom.  Just dig deep into the quotes of those that are bring us this
   Crowleyism, it will chill your soul.

    Mauri  (2/9/08)



                The Golden Compass - Crowleyism for Children

   [Aleister_Crowley.png] The ideas argued by outraged religious groups on
   the web against the new movie for children, “The Golden Compass,”
   encouraged me to buy a ticket. December 7 I went to see it in the
   theater.  According to the plot, Lyra, the twelve-year old heroine,
   deserted by her parents, was now raising herself in an environment
   surrounded by evil.  I could identify with that. As the family falls
   apart, I’m sure Lyra’s plight is identified with by much of the
   youthful audience that is the movie’s target.  It is the solution given
   by the story that I have a disagreement with.  The solution is war.
   But how does a child wage war against forces much greater than
   herself?  The answer is to use Magick and the power of secret
   societies, such as the witches.  The Ice Bear showed up right in the
   nick, roaring and leading the battle with loyalty and devotion for a
   stranger in trouble.  The glue of a confusing and weak plot was the
   Golden Compass, which was used mainly as a crystal ball to convince
   others to join in on the physical fight.  I got the distinct feeling
   the plot, yet another gory war, was not of as much importance to the
   movie as the introduction of ideas one might call Crowleyism.  Raise
   the audience’s adrenalin and artificially empower them with a victory
   and then bath them in a propaganda designed to enslave them in
   failure.  Classic Crowleyism.

   It doesn’t matter what your religion is, the message of this movie for
   children is depressing.  Who wants to live in such a fear-based world
   full of witches and daemons?   It’s an insult to the other species with
   which we share our earth home, as it depicts them as only having value
   when they do our bidding.  Movies should teach children skills and true
   independence.  Instead this movie teaches them Crowleyism with all its
   magick and witchcraft.

           To begin with the witches and friends do not represent
   paganism.  No major religion that practiced this anti-family kind of
   belief lasted long.  The harsh environment would have wiped them out.
   The witches are so dependent on their evil spells, they are incapable
   of supplying themselves with food, clothing and shelter, let alone the
   huge effort required to raise their young, if they had any with no real
   men.  They would soon become a predator’s dream.  And it is the
   predators among us that want our children to live in a dream world of
   magick, becoming the perfect prey.  Believe me, your ancestors were
   clever all on their own without the questionable aid of magick, or you
   wouldn’t be here.  No society survives long when belief systems become
   totally dysfunctional.

   Much of the Crowleyism in this movie is a matter of semantics.  Take
   the Daemon.  According to the story, a person’s soul (Daemon) is an
   animal that lives outside the body, with which one communicates.  In
   other words everyone is daemon possessed, and by the way you are the
   daemon (pronounced deemon).  Witches, fallen angels and now Demons are
   good.  Evil has been wiped out by the use of the pen.  We can no longer
   look at the evil counterpart of an issue because everything has been
   re-defined as good. Classic Crowley!  This takes away one’s defense of
   protecting oneself from things that aren’t so good, by saying they
   don’t exist.  One might take the same fantasy idea of having an animal
   spirit that follows one through life as a companion.  Making the spirit
   a separate entity and giving it a good name, is an idea that may
   provide comfort.  Many people find great love in their animal
   companions (pets) in life and I think for some that relationship may
   continue after the loved animal dies.  This idea may be empowering,
   that we are never alone.  Even if the story follows ideas of animism,
   that you have an animal spirit that contributes to your personality,
   why call it a Daemon?  The Pullman idea is that we are all daemon
   possessed, and without our daemons we die. The clue to the real intent
   is the use the word Daemon.  The same idea applies to the use of the
   word Witch or witchcraft.

   The magick of science, Quantum Mechanics, is introduced in Pullman’s
   stories by giving Lyra’s world parallel universes connected by “dust.”
   No logical argument could refute these ideas because they aren’t based
   on logic; Quantum Mechanics is based on logick (magick).  It has proved
   far more useful as a mystery religion than it has as a set of
   scientific principles that predicts and explains things.

            Stories for children should have a moral message.  Fantasy is
   useful for allegory, otherwise life should be depicted the way it is.
   Better to show children learning home arts, such as handcrafting, than
   showing them learning to do magick spells.  The Pullman story teaches
   the ultimate lie of Crowleyism, that the road to freedom is "Do what
   thou wilt” and then tries to control God by the practice of Magick.
   When in fact magick is the ultimate dependence, often leading to
   criminal behavior to supply needs.  The road to independence and
   freedom is learning life skills, including the physical production of
   necessities and the social glue of morality.

   Mauri  (2/3/08)


                            Fifteen Commandments

   [the-ten-commandments.jpg]  One of my favorite comedic scenes is from
   the movie “History of the World Part 1” where Mel Brooks comes down
   from the mountain holding 3 stone tablets with the Lord’s 15 (he drops
   one of the tablets), er 10 commandments.  I often wonder what the other
   5 commandments might have been.  Watching the global elite, as they
   attempt to destroy our world, I can guess at a couple of those missing
   commandments.

               The DNA that holds the blueprint for life is unbelievably
   complex. Gene after gene after gene down to the minutest of detail
   determines our physical self.  And every self is unique.  As these
   unique selves are combined into ecosystems, from the microscopic
   bacteria to the macro giant tree, these DNA controlled beings dance
   with each other with such precision that life is born, sustains itself
   and dies in near perfect harmony.  All of this is under the control of
   a “God” that is ubiquitous.  And that is exactly how it should be.  Man
   is lucky if he has some control over himself; he is infinity away from
   becoming God.  So one of those missing commandments surely is “ thou
   shalt not try to become God.”  Some science is just too dangerous to
   mess with and that includes any experiments where the outcome cannot be
   controlled.  The first commandment of science is “do no harm.”

               According to the latest news from across the pond, the UK
   has just approved human-animal embryo research.  It makes you wonder
   how many chimera half human babies out there are sitting all alone in
   cages, just waiting to be tortured in the name of progress, if turning
   the earth into a living hell may be called progress.  Who put these
   psychopaths in change and why doesn’t the public stop them?  I think it
   is time for 5 more commandments just for the crazies in power directed
   at putting an end to their insanity.  Following the money that funds a
   world going mad and seeing that the evil spigot gets turned off might
   be a good start.

    www.guardian.co.uk/science/2007/sep/04/stem.cell.research

    www.abc.net.au/am/content/2007/s2025541.htm

    Mauri (1/28/08)



                             Brilliant or Crazy

     [Frankenstein.jpg] The power of the Internet has lifted the veil of
    secrecy on some of the goals of the Global Elite.  Which brings us to
      the subject of Eugenics.  Living forever is an ancient goal as is
    ideation of superiority.  What kind of superman-woman are we talking
     about here?  The elite seem obsessed with feel-good activities and
       therefore focus on drugs and sex.  Our superman-woman will have
    exaggerated sex organs and sex drive for sure, if only through drugs
    and surgery.  He-she will be cunning and devious to the max, because
     after all that is what got the elite their exalted position in the
     first place.  Their obsessive focus in life on the material pushes
   their ideal human creation in the direction of an amoral, all powerful,
   sex addicted, drug addict who lives forever.  These elites will have to
      keep a few moral, responsible humans around to do the grunt work,
     including science and technology.  Because you see amoral people do
   very poor science, partly because they can’t think beyond their next
   organism or high.  Doing evil seems to delight them and evil is in the
                        end destructive even to them.

               My father used to read all the “live-for-ever and better
   through chemistry” literature.  He asked me to read it too.  It was
   full of science fallacy and holes. I have trouble taking their claims
   seriously. I sometimes wonder if their desire to live forever is really
   a fear of standing naked and exposed before their maker.  People who
   live good lives rarely fear death.

   Few elites actually make the contributions they like to take credit
   for.  Mostly they steal and misuse the hard work of others.  If the
   “others” are eliminated due to feeling of competition, then the bloated
   Frankenstein elites will surely fall.  They make no real contribution
   to society.  Like a parasite they only know how to suck the host’s
   blood dry.  The elites age; just like the rest of us they become infirm
   with time.  They grow slow and ugly as age advances them, just like the
   rest of us.  Who wants to live forever in a body that no longer works
   and a mind tormented by its own dysfunction?  Not I.

    Mauri  (1/22/08)



                            Women’s Liberation

   [Women's%20Lib.jpg] The issue of men versus women is bigger than
   women’s liberation.  Women’s lib is in part just a response to the
   initial stages of the break-up of the family.  Most of the women I
   knew, who had to leave the home to earn a living did so under great
   duress.  I know this was true of myself.  What I really wanted to be
   was a housewife and mother.  So I was extremely grateful when the wages
   that I earned at least came close to competing with a man’s.  I had a
   child to raise on my own.  Most of the divorces I saw were of a
   middle-aged man walking out on his wife and children for a younger
   woman.  It is no accident that women have become obsessed with youth
   and beauty.  I think maybe movies and TV may have played a role.

   There are things we can do to rid ourselves of the unhealthy ideas of
   beauty created by extreme insecurity.  Women are beautiful just the way
   God made them.  Painting one’s face like a prostitute gives the wrong
   message.  It’s expensive, devastating to the animals the poisons are
   tested on, and creates feelings of low self-esteem when you wash your
   face.  I’m not opposed to maintaining one’s health and beauty through
   positive habits, good food and good grooming, but women need to be
   viewed for what they provide to the family and community, not how they
   look in Calvin Klein Jeans.  The lowest form of accomplishment is to be
   a trophy-wife; the highest is to be a nurturing partner and mother.

   Wife and mother is a job that has no guaranteed income.  In the past
   widows with children often became instantly poor.  Even I have the
   story of a great, great grandmother who washed other peoples clothes to
   barely feed her young after she was widowed.  The best guarantee any of
   us have is an extended family and a stable community.  The break-up of
   the family, including extended, has been the goal of the global elite,
   who only want to rob us.  It is easier to do when we are kept on the
   constant move by the opening and closing of their corporations and
   factories.  And when we become old we are viewed as useless feeders.

   Next perhaps we could look at what was happening in the family of
   yesterday if you were a man.  Think back, how many remember their
   father as absent, uncaring or even violent and alcoholic.  His problem
   was that in order to support his family in the style of the Joneses
   down the street, he worked two jobs.  Or he worked in a factory or mine
   that compromised his health.  Unions arose for a reason.  An abusive
   employer set the stage for that abuse to trickle down to the wife and
   children at home.  Spousal and child abuse should not be tolerated as
   anyone’s right.  The same is true of employer abuse.  The object of
   your life is not to make someone else rich.  I think the society should
   look at anyone with too much money with a certain amount of suspicion.
   Not like we do today where we try to emulate the rich or supper rich.
   Having excess amounts of money is not a virtue.  Even if your neighbors
   don’t, judgment day will ask for an accounting. (The supper rich are
   increasingly exposed as being into criminal activity.)   Community
   leaders should be those who sacrifice for the community, not those who
   steal from it and then use the ill gotten money to buy privilege so
   that they can steal more.

   With both the before and after women’s lib the real victims were the
   children. I think any real solution to this ancient issue of men versus
   women will return both parents to the nurturing care of their young.
   How the children are raised determines our future.  It doesn’t take a
   village to raise a child; it takes two parents, grandparents, aunts and
   uncles.  The family needs to come back and what is more the extended
   family needs to return, along with stable communities that support this
   way of life.  Factory owned towns that have the power to pull up stakes
   at any time should be replaced with a diversity of small businesses and
   a better distribution of wealth in the community.  Elite abuse has
   become intolerable.  It is time that we begin to take better care of
   ourselves.

   Mauri (1/15/08)



                      How to Get Slimed on the Internet

   [crying_turtle.jpg] Let us begin this topic with the greatest slime job
   of all.  The attack on the reputation of Ted Gunderson was the most
   effective and long lasting, making it the true classic. What did Ted do
   to deserve this?  He went against the False Memory crud and continued
   to expose pedophilia in high places.  I followed much of his work and
   he seemed genuine and accurate to me.  But what do I know.  I was often
   asked my opinion on the matter and I would reply that I had no inside
   information, but I always liked what he had to say.  Then one day out
   of the blue this slime list began to grow.  John W. DeCamp was now
   accused of nefarious activities along with Ted.  John wrote the book
   “The Franklin Cover-Up: Child Abuse, Satanism, and Murder in
   Nebraska.”  It is the best, and most rigorously investigated material
   on the subject of child-sex trafficking ever published.   Okay, we have
   a connection.  Expose child-sex trafficking in high places and you put
   yourself at risk of being slimed or worse.

   Lately this list has started to grow again.  Alex Jones’ has crept in
   along side Gunderson and DeCamp.  Alex Jones’ success is questioned,
   such as how did he just walk into Bohemian Grove without them knowing.
   I can tell you how.  I did it all the time.  He just walked past the
   Programmed Zombies and didn’t say much.  Other names are added to the
   sliming, as needed, including Ron Paul, Loose Change, We are Change and
   even Ed Brown.  The list is starting to sound like the “Globalist’s
   Enemies List.”  These people are not even related in what they do.  Ted
   investigated child-sex trafficking, John wrote a book about a famous
   case he was involved in.  He is not a part of the alternative media but
   still works as a lawyer.  Alex, Loose Change and We are Change work in
   the 911 Truth Movement.  Ed Brown stood up against the IRS, and Ron
   Paul is a politician.  Everyone represents his or her own worldview.
   No one in the Alternative Media is lock step on any idea.  It truly is
   a war of information.  A concerted effort at sliming others is the
   lowest form of argument.  To me this slime list is becoming silly!  It
   worked for a while with Ted, but as the list grows it loses all
   credibility.

   Mauri  (1/8/08)


                                Solar Cooker

   [Light.jpg] The collapse of the dollar has caused me some concern.  I
   use dollars to buy food and the energy to move me from place to place
   and to keep me warm in the winter.  Every year windstorms or snowstorms
   bring the power down where I live.  Without power you can’t pump gas.
   Without gas you can’t run the trucks that bring us food.  With the
   collapse of the dollar I wonder about my dependence on the criminals we
   have allowed to run our lives. What if the power goes down
   permanently?  How would I survive?  I like technology, when it is used
   to improve people’s lives and make them independent, not for war and
   control, which is how it is presently being used by sick power elites.
   I went to my favorite tool for information on how I might gain more
   personal power over my life, the Internet, and I discovered the solar
   cooker.

   I saw photos of browned skinned people cooking their gourmet delights
   under the midday sun using its free energy.  The sight empowered me.  I
   wanted to be like them; free of my dependence on people I do not
   trust.  I wanted to be able to determine my own destiny.  I wanted to
   break my shackles of slavery to the grand design of someone else.  I
   wanted my own small design.  And at that moment I felt it begins with a
   solar cooker.  The design was simple and easy to understand.  If one
   could boil water by collecting the sun’s rays using just reflective
   metal, one could make a steam engine.  If one could make a steam
   engine, one could make a generator.  The solution to the coming
   collapse of our world empire is the rise of the little people.  The
   real brain trust is with them.  Small businesses, everywhere, bringing
   forth new solutions, freeing people to use God’s abundance, the power
   of the sun and the wind, to supply their needs.  The power of God’s
   seeds to produce a new plant the following season will give us a
   reliable food source.  As you can see, I think the solution is
   spiritual.  I know my spirit soars when I solve a problem, and that
   solution makes the world a better place.  I know, together the little
   people can solve any problem.  We just need to let our collective
   spirits soar, get rid of our dependence on people who have sworn
   allegiance to evil and with God’s help take the risk that we will
   prevail.

    Mauri (1/1/08)


                            Business of Congress

   [Paul_revere_ride.gif] For years Congress has been rated by how hard it
   worked at passing new laws.  They seemed to be in some kind of mad race
   to get something done.  They were even criticized when they went on
   vacation or had a recess.   The bills past by the pound were
   scrutinized when the Congressman or Senator ran for re-election. It
   didn’t matter what the bill did or what the new law was, only that it
   got passed.  Frequently the bills were not even read.  What kind of a
   race are we in that these un-read and under-reported bills are being
   implemented?  Where are we headed?  Who do these people work for?

          Border guards are given long prison terms and the drug smuggler
   is given immunity.  The Justice department shows its loyalty and it
   isn’t to you and me.  Homeland security herds the vulnerable into
   crowded conditions then limits food and water.  Anarchy breaks out so
   they confiscate the guns of the good citizens.  They break up families
   by removing the children.  (Isn’t that what the Nazis did when they put
   people into concentration camps – who do these people think they are
   kidding?)  A university mass shooting breaks out and the local police
   are told to stand down until the Feds arrive. Everyone hides behind
   trees until the killer shoots himself.  Trillions of dollars are
   missing from the pentagon.  Suddenly our elected officials are becoming
   millionaires.  The business of Congress is turning out to be to sell
   America to foreign interests, including the global elite that once
   claimed to be American.  Perhaps it is time for the people to better
   scrutinize what it is their elected officials do, who do they represent
   and how are they are financed?

          Maybe we need to get in a mad race to get rid of some of the
   legislation that has been enacted. The business of Congress is being
   exposed as having more in common with the Mafia than the Founding
   Fathers.  Massive corruption is about ready to topple the once great
   America and perhaps the world.  We need a bon fire, not of books, but
   of all these destructive and self-serving bills. Limited government
   with greater local control best serves the needs of the people.

   Mauri  (12/26/07)


                        The Real Meaning of Christmas

   [Santa.gif] Christmas is under attack.  It is actually a pagan holiday
     and not the birthday of Jesus, or so its detractors declare.  Satan
    Claus dressed all in red promises gifts especially to the children of
   the wealthy, because they have been extra good.  Our debt piles high as
   the salivating global elite can’t wait to get more of our money.  We
      cut down a tree in its youth and drag it indoors, spreading brown
     needles among bows and bobbles, We light up the tree then tell our
   children lies all in the spirit of the season.  If they do as we say a
   jolly old man will come down the chimney and reward them.  Some people
       look forward to Christmas the entire year, some feel depressed
     remembering a time of family dysfunction.  But lately Christmas has
        been under attack and especially the Christian version of its
       celebration.  Perhaps it is time to look at the real meaning of
                                 Christmas.

   Christmas is a season holiday, occurring just days after the winter
   solstice which is the darkest day of the year.  The dead of winter is a
   time to share, especially food and especially in cold climates.  It is
   a time when families and communities put aside their differences to
   make it through until the return of nature’s abundance.  These ideas
   fit well with the teachings of Jesus.  Families and communities need
   bonding celebrations that emphasize the positive aspects of life.  As
   Christmas takes a hit from those that would destroy us, perhaps a new
   look at the real meaning of the season is due.  Maybe the competition
   for the biggest tree or the most gifts has been a little
   self-centered.   I personally think it is never a good idea to lie to
   your children.  The meaning of the season is to support and bring joy
   to the most vulnerable, including the children.  It is a time to
   celebrate family, community, share one’s wealth and help the needy.
   Everyone deep in his or her heart knows this is the real meaning of
   Christmas.

    Mauri (12/18/07)


                           False Memories Growing

   [Swastik.jpg] The existence of people, who think they have read
   documents that  global elites are setting up a North American Union, is
   creating a “North American Union Panic.”  According to the media the
   numbers of delusional "conspiracy theorists" are increasing by the day.
   As shown by the moderators and media reports of recent debates, even
   presidential candidate Ron Paul may be subjected to false memories of
   documents he thinks he may have read.  These false memories coincide
   with the skyrocketing levels of autism.  Do you suppose it is something
   in the water?  NAU panic is similar to SRA panic except SRA (Satanic
   Ritual Abuse) false memories are about events long in the past, while
   the new NAU false memories are about events happening today.  The False
   Memory Syndrome Foundation, which has already demonstrated that
   long-term memory is unreliable, will simply have to expand their
   research to include the reliability of short-term memory.  It is
   getting so that one can no longer trust one's lying eyes about what one
   has just read.  And judging by opinion poles this condition is
   growing.  But don’t worry, just keep listening to the mainstream media,
   they will tell you what to do.

               To test if you may be affected by this condition just look
   at the above photo of the US Navy’s barracks built in the late 1960s at
   Coronado Island in San Diego.  What do you see?  If you think you see a
   swastika perhaps this serious condition has affected you.

    Mauri (12/10/08)


                                   Hitler

   [kitler.jpg] December 7 is the sixty-six year anniversary of Pearl
   Harbor, December 7, 1941.  The United States declared war on Japan. A
   few days later, December 11, 1941, Germany and Italy declared war on
   the United States.  And the mass murder escalated, along with the
   deception.  Out of the chaos, one figure survived beyond all the rest,
   Adolf Hitler.  He remains the subject of endless debate.  Even his
   bones have disappeared leading to speculation that perhaps he lived on
   after a staged death in the bunker.  (I personally think he died in the
   bunker, but I like the story that the Vatican has his bones.  They like
   to collect such things and not tell anybody.)  For some reason
   disinformation material has a habit of resurrecting the dead.  Perhaps
   that helps spread the lie.

   I saw Hitler as a deeply controlled and frequently misunderstood
   enigma.  He wasn’t brilliant.  Being cruel is in a way being stupid.
   But as any search through the photographic history of WWII will show,
   Hitler had “The Gift.”  The last century produced many mass murderers,
   whose kill numbers compete with Hitler’s, such as Stalin or Mao
   Tse-Tung.  But one barely remembers them because they didn’t have “The
   Gift.”  I am eternally thankful that no one since Hitler has had “The
   Gift.”  I’ve been suspicious that a few candidates have tried and
   failed.  When Hitler’s magick is not reincarnated in a new Hitler
   wanabe, there is little left to do but to bring back the magick by
   reinventing the original Hitler through revisionist history.  And while
   they are at it, a good measure of anti-Semitism is thrown in; the two
   do seem to go together.

   Much humor surrounds the Hitler myth.  One way to handle our terror is
   to make fun of it. Cats that look like Hitler are posted on the web.
   No other human being in all of history has had such an honor.  Above is
   the top rated Kitler from the website of the same name, “Kitler #21973
   (owned by Crawford County Humane Society of Meadville, PA (which,
   ironically, uses a gas chamber to dispatch animals not adopted)) is
   rated 10.000 out of 10!”  Would you vow allegiance and follow this
   Kitler into the depths of Hell?  Hail Kitler!

   Mauri (12/4/07)


                                 Satan Lies

        [Michael%20and%20Satan.jpg] The occult is known by its secret
    knowledge.  Join our little group, take a death oath and some of that
    secret will be revealed to you.  Here is the secret I learned in the
   occult group I was raised in.  Satan lies!  The secret knowledge is all
    about controlling YOU.  One of the major ways that is done is to only
   reveal bits and pieces and just when you think you might be starting to
   understand, you are bombarded with a whole new set of rules.  The dogma
   twists and turns, the real magick just beyond reach.  I never take the
   dogma preached by occult worshipers too seriously, because I know that
    Satan lies.  The occult goes wherever it can to find inspiration, the
  ancient world and the world’s religions.  It goes to science and nature
  and even finds inspiration in technology such as cyborgs. It’s the ugly
    lies that Satan attaches to these things that elevate it to the level
      of magick and power.  An example is to sacrifice a child to some
     ancient deity.  At the end of that ceremony you have just sold your
   soul and now someone else owns YOU.  The child goes to Heaven and God.
   The power gained in the sacrifice is your power, not the victim’s. I
    know these things. The real wounds of the occult are self-inflicted.
      And as these wounds bleed they often create obsessive-compulsive
   behavior where the evil escalates, like a serial killer that just keeps
    killing.  Under the power of the cult, that you are feeding with the
       continual loss of your freewill, you race to the most powerless
                       position of all, hell on earth.

   Mauri (11/29/07)


                          Another Conspiracy Theory

   [Raven.jpg] This essay is painful for me to write.  I must read about a
    time I normally keep buried safely in the past. I have to go back and
   look at photos, which is very triggering and puts a pit in my stomach.
    If I skip over things quickly it is because dealing with those things
   is like touching a hot stove with your bear hand.  Your instinct is to
    pull away quickly.  But, I feel a need to muddy the waters of history
      just a bit, because I might just be right.  My conspiracy theory
   involves some very interesting figures from the past, Jack Parsons and
                                Howard Hughes

   Jack Parsons is famous for two things, creating the rocket fuel that
   got us to the moon and his Babalon Working to create a “moonchild” thus
   ushering in the Aeon of Horus.  He had one foot in science and the
   other foot in the occult.  He was not alone.  The mid-twentieth century
   military industrial complex was into the same game.  They still are.
   Both of Jack’s worlds came together in Pasadena, CA, where he helped
   create and run the Jet Propulsion Laboratory at Cal Tech, and he helped
   organize the O.T.O. get-togethers out of his home.  I believe they
   called it the “Pasadena Mansion” because one of the first things I
   remembered when this period of my life started to bubble up was child
   sex trafficking in a “mansion.”  I felt I was driven to Pasadena to get
   to there.

   In 1952 Jack Parsons was blown to kingdom come in a chemical explosion
   in his home.  No need to rule it a “suicide,” an “accident” would do.
   They saved the “suicide” label for his mother who died hours later of a
   drug overdose.  If this story isn’t ripe for a hundred conspiracy
   theories, I don’t know what is.   Few Jack Parsons’ fans believe it was
   an accident in Jack’s case.  Not much is said about his mother.  Jack
   Parsons’ supporters are found in the main among those who are
   interested in his occult activities.  They like to paint him as a very
   wicked man, in a good way.  I feel this is probably causing Jack’s
   spirit to roll over in his grave.  The Jack that I knew would have much
   preferred to be known for his science.

   My conspiracy theory of John Whiteside Parsons’ death is that it was
   orchestrated because he did a selfless act of kindness and tried to
   help those in some mighty powerless positions.  Since this does not fit
   the image of the “Great Beast” I’m sure my theory will find no favor
   among his occultist supporters.  But then I am more one of his science
   fans.

   In the early 1940’s Jack was riding high on the Beast.  He was
   definitely into sex magick, especially when one Marjorie Elizabeth
   Cameron showed up, with her soft flowing red hair.  He had found his
   calling.  But what came next changed everything.  His home, which he
   had very little control over, started to fill up with some hardcore
   evil.  First came the Nazis and the Mafia, followed by the tiny tots.
   The guest list expanded along with the rituals.  Taken from “Sex and
   Rockets” by John Carter and Robert Anton Wilson (pg 158), on August
   1946, Jack Parsons sent a formal letter of resignation from the OTO to
   Aleister Crowley stating, “I do not believe that the OTO, as an
   autocratic organization, constitutes a true and proper medium for the
   expression and attainment of these principles [the rights of Man.]”

   While Jack’s response to the child sex trafficking was to hide me, one
   of the tots, among guests’ coats.  Howard Hughes would anxiously await
   the night’s festivities, and especially the children.  I remember
   Howard Hughes as a definite pedophile; a child knows these things.  In
   most of the men, I was sex trafficked to, this affliction was less
   obvious.

   This conspiracy theory now has a major conflict, with the Nazis, the
   Mafia, Howard Hughes and much of the rest of the gang on the “keep the
   child sex magick” side, and Jack on the “send these kids home” side.
   Oh, Oh, Jack was becoming a problem who might just spill the beans.
   What to do?  Well logically, one might start by putting Jack under
   pressure, to perhaps get him to fall into line, by say ruining his
   reputation and taking away his security clearance at Hughes Aircraft.
   Howard would certainly agree to help punish that party pooper.
   According to John Carter, in his book "Sex and Rockets," that is just
   what happened to Jack.  But Jack did not seem repentant enough and
   maybe others at the O.T.O. might join him.  And there was always the
   question of Jack’s mother.  What did she know and would she tell?
   Jack’s death was surrounded by all the elements of a conspiracy.  It
   was preceded by years of a down hill slide in his reputation that
   seemed to come from almost every direction.  He had fought back and
   underestimated his enemies.    Child sex trafficking is no small issue;
   a whole foundation has been formed to keep its victims from talking or
   at least being heard.  It is called the False Memory Syndrome
   Foundation and has some mighty powerful members on its board.

    Mauri (11/20/07)



                    Howard Hughes and the Gemstone files

   [Flight.jpg] My problem with the Gemstone files and what was recorded
   as fact lies with Howard Hughes.  Hughes was not a minor player on
   history’s stage, nor was he innocent of wrong doing.  But the story of
   Hughes as told by the press at the time, makes much more sense to me,
   than that told in the Gemstone files.  I remember Hughes as a
   psychologically frail pedophile.  And this was when he was at his
   peak.  He played Hollywood, but was not exactly a ladies man.  I
   remember a figure with a psychology closer to Michael Jackson, than
   Errol Flynn. Walking around in Kleenex boxes sort of fit him.  Someone
   definitely controlled and probably kept drugged Howard Hughes in his
   later years.  Those some ones had ties with the Mormon Church (Mormon
   Mafia), Los Vegas mobsters, money laundering through the Hughes Medical
   Foundations and more.  Not only did he “supposedly” give a will to some
   Mormon in the dessert, leaving a portion of his money to the Mormon
   Church.  But according to True Ott, a good Mormon living in Cedar City
   Utah, file # 5 of the Gemstone series was put in his hands for safe
   keeping.

               The problem with Hughes was his obsessive-compulsive
   disorders, which caused him to disappear from public view.  Endless
   speculation and rumors circulated, especially at the end, if he was
   even still alive.  Nothing fed those rumors like the Gemstone papers.
   They stated that in 1957 Onassis had Hughes kidnapped and arranged a
   fake marriage to Jean Peters.  He was then dragged to the Bahamas and
   later to a cell on Onassis’ island, Skorpios. L. Wayne Rector a
   “Hughes” double then filled in for the real Hughes.  In 1971 Howard
   Hughes was overdosed on Heroin, and it was L. Wayne Rector that was the
   Los Vegas recluse.  The Gemstone papers read more like a pulp fiction
   novel, than anyone’s life story.   I followed the Howard Hughes scandal
   in the papers and magazines at the time.  I felt they told the real
   story, of the real Howard Hughes in Los Vegas.  The first news reports
   out most often tell the most accurate history, because the media
   doesn’t yet know when to lie.

   Obsessive-compulsive disorders sometimes include pedophilia.  No one
   could argue that Howard Hughes wasn’t obsessive compulsive.  The Howard
   Hughes of Los Vegas, collecting his urine in jars, didn’t just have a
   nervous break down in later life.  His problems began in his childhood,
   festering into a love of children in adulthood, and deteriorating down
   hill from there.  The elite really are mean to their children.  Howard
   Hughes and Michael Jackson have much in common.

    Mauri (11/17/07)


                         Gemstone and Disinformation

   [vulture.jpg]

   History is best put together using as many sources of information as
   possible.  We all only see a tiny piece of the puzzle, even if we are
   one of the major players.  Our view is through the smoky colored
   glasses of our own experiences in life.  It is when everyone’s view is
   combined that a more real picture comes together.  This brings me to
   the subject of this essay, the Gemstone files and disinformation.

   The Gemstone files were composed of over a thousand handwritten pages
   by Bruce Roberts sent to Mae Brussell, researcher and talk radio show
   host. Parts were released to the public beginning in 1969.  The
   material focuses on the Kennedy family, the Hughes Empire, the Mafia
   and Onasis. Much of what is written is known history.  By the deathbed
   confessions of E. Howard Hunt, history continues to reveal more and
   more proof of the Kennedy death conspiracy players.  The problem with
   the Gemstone files is that for those that know a conspiracy did exist
   to kill Kennedy, it conveniently leads one down the path of Onasis, the
   Mafia and stops there. For any leak it is easy to blame the Mafia;
   everyone already knows they kill people.

   September 25, 2007, Tony Thomas Gambino was a guest on talk radio host
   Greg Szymanski’s show. He told his inside the Mafia view of history.
   He said that the Kennedy brothers were killed because they had murdered
   Marilyn Monroe at the end of a love affaire in which both brothers had
   participated.  The biographies of Marilyn Monroe, written by friends,
   suggested the same thing.  Marilyn was the darling of important Mafia
   figures.  Interestingly Tony also suggested that the Twin Towers were
   blown with the help of the Mafia to get the gold buried beneath them.
   I don’t doubt Tony’s veracity.  I’m sure this is how the Mafia’s help
   was enlisted, with the Kennedy Brother’s murder you have a vengeance
   motive and with the Twin Towers you have a greed motive. And that is
   exactly how organized crime thinks.  But the Mafia is only taking
   orders from above, whose motives are vastly different.  These criminal
   groups give information on a need to know basis, and it is often a web
   of little white lies.

               It seems unlikely that the Kennedy brothers had anything to
   do with Marilyn’s untimely demise.  Beta sex slaves rarely get old.  A
   long list of famous beauties have died in their late thirties including
   Jane Mansfield and Anna Nicole Smith.  One of the motives given by both
   Cathy O’Brien and Bryce Taylor (Sue Ford) for writing their tell all
   books about life as a sex slave “presidential model” is because they
   felt they would be murdered if they lived to a certain age. (Old people
   are more likely to start remembering things and start talking,)

   The Kennedy brothers made a lot of enemies at the top because they
   didn’t play the game right.  Each person that participated in their
   respective demise may have had a different motive. The writer of the
   Gemstone papers may have been honestly reporting what he knew of the
   affair.  Much of what he wrote about has been verified by other
   sources.  Mae Brussell was the researcher that put the Gemstone files
   together, as people had sent them to her.  Every player, who reported
   on the files or the murders of the Kennedy brothers, may have been
   totally honest and only wished to warn the public.  But the files were
   written by only one man and reflected only what he thought he knew.
   History is proving some true and some as fabrication (those little
   white lies.)

   My problem with the Gemstone papers concerns Howard Hughes.  In this
   area I think the files have much disinformation.  I have no idea why.
   But the speculation does not match up with other known facts about
   Howard.  One thing that can be said about the Gemstone files is that it
   follows a typical pattern of much disinformation material in that it
   leads one to some erroneous conclusions.  The most pronounced of these
   is the “little group” theory of social reform.  If we get rid of this
   little group it will all go away.  If we get rid of that little group
   it will all go away.  What little groups are these?  Communists,
   Zionists, Fundamentalist Muslims, Jesuits, and in the case of the
   Gemstone files it’s the Mafia.  And the little group may even take a
   less public appearance, while the larger evil just continues to grow.
   Maybe we should instead hold each criminal accountable for his or her
   activity, including Presidents, Queens, Kings, Oil Barons or even the
   Pope.

    Mauri (11/13/07)



                              Wrong Rabbit Hole

   [rabbit_hole.jpg] With so many patriots, all with their own point of
   view, one wonders whom to trust.  Could your favorite leader in the
   patriot crusade be from the other side and telling a lie?  The fact
   that you learn the truth isn’t the only issue to those who would rule
   the world.  Just as important is who to blame and even more important
   is what to do, sending the reader or listener down the rabbit hole of
   their choice.  The disinformation artist tells almost the whole truth
   in all its gory detail, with just an alteration or two perhaps leading
   to the wrong instigator or a cure that is worse than the disease.
   After all it doesn’t really matter what you know, if in the end they
   can herd you where they want you to go.  That is why just the right
   disinformation imbedded among the truth is so effect.

   I am personally suspicious of the salve of a one-world religion. I
   think everyone’s relationship with God should be personal. You may
   learn of the Armageddon that is being planned and do nothing at all,
   because you think you have the solution in the rapture. Another group I
   have trouble supporting is the “think positive thoughts” crowd, but if
   you disagree you can always just go watch Oprah, its biggest
   supporter.  What could possibly be wrong with having only positive
   thoughts?

   My introduction into the “expose the evil” movement started in the
   early 1990s when I began to have flashbacks of severe childhood abuse.
   Apparently I had lots of company. With dedication I followed the
   exposure of child abuse on daytime television talk shows.  Oprah slowly
   moved to the front of the pack on this issue, based mainly on her
   confessions of her own childhood abuse.  This made Oprah a “patriot” to
   be trusted, at least for a while.  Then in 1993 she made an abrupt
   about face.

   Taken from the FMS Foundation Newsletter; Vol 2 No.8, August 30, 1993
   is the following:

   “Dear Friends,

               It's happened. We can say it with confidence. The climate
   surrounding the FMS phenomenon has shifted. We see many indications of
   change in addition to the media coverage. People are beginning to
   understand that FMSF is concerned about issues that arise from our
   understanding of memory and suggestibility. It is important to address
   these issues so that the good efforts to improve the situation for
   children and women are not undermined because of incorrect science,
   careless therapy or fraud.”

   Why the jubilant celebration?  They had a friend in Oprah.  Taken from
   the newsletter:

   “‘Is Your Repressed Memory a Lie?’ aired on the Oprah Winfrey Show,
   July 26, 1993. Among the guests were Richard Ofshe, Ph.D., Courage to
   Heal author, Ellen Bass, Melody Gavigan, a retractor, and FMSF members,
   Jack and Pat Collier.”

             I remember Oprah declaring that she didn’t repress her
   memories then expressed doubt that such a thing was possible.  To me
   Oprah deserves the prize as one of the most effective of the
   disinformation artists.  She rounded up the sexually abused sheep then
   devoted one of her final shows on the subject to the FMS wolves
   foundation.  They won the day.  And behind the scenes the abuse
   continued to grow.

             In typical Oprah fashion, her documentary “Living with
   Autism” gave the parents and victims of this disorder a soap box on
   which to speak, which was a good thing. Many of the parents were
   suspicious of the mercury in vaccines as the cause of their child’s
   autism.  But, Oprah’s contribution definitely supported the powers that
   run things behind the scenes.  The following quote was taken from
   Oprah’s website:

    “We contacted the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention about
   whether there is a link between autism and vaccines and they gave us
   the following statement:
   ’CDC places a high priority on vaccine safety and the integrity and
   credibility of its vaccine safety research. This commitment not only
   stems from our scientific and medical dedication, it is also
   personal—for most of us who work at CDC are also parents and
   grandparents. And as such, we too, have high levels of personal
   interest and concern in the health and safety of children, families and
   communities. We simply don't know what causes most cases of autism, but
   we're doing everything we can to find out. The vast majority of science
   to date does not support an association between thimerosal in vaccines
   and autism. But we are currently conducting additional studies to
   further determine what role, if any, thimerosal in vaccines may play in
   the development of autism. It is important to remember, vaccines
   protect and save lives. Vaccines protect infants, children and adults
   from the unnecessary harm and premature death caused by
   vaccine-preventable diseases.’"

            While Oprah may have exposed parental concern about the safety
   of vaccines, she, as always, had the definitive word on the subject.
   And, as always, it was in support of the powers that be, in this case
   the CDC.  Now where is it I get the tickets for Oprah's Christmas
   special, you know the one with all the free stuff?

   Oprah, the Queen of Greed, pushes a philosophy that victims don’t
   really accept, in part because of its cult-like aspects.  “The Secret,”
    a book she thinks we should all embrace, puts out a blame-the-victim
   worldview.  It dictates that we should think only positive thoughts and
   the Universe will reward us with a positive life; we create reality.
   Repressive environments, such as cults, demand smiley faces, reinforced
   by the mantra that the slightest hint of negativity will attract a
   negative consequence.  And this may well be true when one is a slave to
   the desires of others. Being fearful or angry is a self-defense, and if
   the self has no value such negativity must be crushed. It is people who
   live in dream worlds that create their own reality, and they aren’t
   destined to live long in this cruel world. I remember the Satanists
   that I lived around visualized such things as empty parking places.
   What kind of imbecile would ask the Universe to find them a parking
   place?  Trusting a Billionaire these days is becoming more and more
   difficult to do.

   Another tactic of the disinfo-artist is to turn our anger against each
   other in a useless nonproductive fight, or to encourage us to get out
   of control so that we can be quickly and effectively eliminated. The
   constructive use of the energy of anger can move mountains.  The object
   of reasoned thought is to do the right thing when one feels anger, it
   isn’t to do nothing at all or let the anger deteriorate into rage.

   I wonder why God gave man negative emotions?  Perhaps to get one to
   move and defend one’s self or to make the decision that life is worth
   fighting for. Life is a struggle, and the winner is usually the one
   that puts energy into planning ahead.  Critical thought aids
   survival.   The object of life is to feel, not just feel good.  I
   always judge the patriots I listen to by theirs solutions as much as
   what they expose.  Sometimes I agree and sometimes I disagree.  My
   advice is to listen and learn from what is being said, think critically
   and never to follow anyone blindly.

   http://www.fmsfonline.org/fmsf93.830.html

   Oprah Autism and CDC

   Mauri (11/6/07)


                                  Childhood

   [Toy.jpg] What happens to people who grow to adulthood deprived of
   their childhood?  The little friend to the left sits in my bedroom,
   high on a dresser where I can see her.  She has lots of friends, of the
   stuffed animal variety.  Once in a while I pick her up and hold her
   close to my chest.  But mostly I just behold her visually.  My stuffed
   animals sometimes fill me with guilt that I am selfish to have them.
   Wasting the soft cotton inside on a toy is bad for the environment.
   And if I buy more I will surely cause an ecological disaster.  I don’t
   think that is true, but deep inside it is hard to rid oneself of ideas
   taught in childhood. Where else would those feelings come from?  My
   stuffed animals are my personal sin, equivalent perhaps to the illicit
   drug or affair of someone else.  My autism keeps this addiction under
   the “bug in a jar with holes in the lid” kind of control that is my
   life.  I keep them all clean and never actually play with them.  But
   they have done more to improve my mental health than anything else I
   have tried in my healing journey.  In a funny way they have given me a
   childhood.  I am not alone.  Most survivors of sever childhood abuse
   have stuffed animal collections.  It is just a given.

               The worst thing the Global elite with their New World Order
   do is rob our youth of their childhood.  And the biggest way they do
   this is to sexualize them at a young age.  This is guaranteed to lead
   to a dysfunctional adult.  Childhood is the time when one learns to
   take care of oneself.  And sexual roles play no part in this process,
   except as it relates to a little visual curiosity, but no touching.
   Show me yours and I’ll show you mine means only show and it also
   involves an agreement between those of equal power, children. Mix in an
   adult and you have a serious sexual abuse issue.  Any school that has a
   teacher talk about such private matters as sex to a child should be
   sued.  This is fear producing for a reason.  Children who become sex
   objects sometimes don’t make it to adulthood.

   With the denial of the public and the support of the False Memory
   Syndrome Foundation, the pre-school molestation of tiny tots was such a
   success that the molestation is now moving into the public schools.
   Now they are having one scandal after another.  Oh well, maybe the
   criminal school police can be used to keep a lid on what really goes on
   and protect the school from the parents.  They certainly aren’t there
   to protect the students.  Ask 16-year-old Pleajhai Mervin of Palmdale,
   CA, whose arm was broken by the school guard for dropping a piece of
   cake.  (Note: so far she has not appeared on the Oprah Show.)  Don’t
   let the government schools abuse your kids for their own sick reasons.
   Or as a best-case scenario, they may be forced to re-create their own
   childhood as an adult.

   Mauri (11/5/07)


                         Oprah’s School for Girls

     [one-room-schoolhouse.jpg] I have no objection to helping the Third
   World, if that is their desire.  But, much of what masquerades as help,
   is really an attack on the indigenous population.  It is important that
   communities have dignity.  The responsible person for outsiders to deal
   with is the community leader.  So why is it considered a positive when
       strangers come into the community and begin to separate out the
   children, for re-education.  Schools for gifted children are buzzwords
     for schools that conduct mind control programs.  Many survivors of
     these schools or programs in America have come out against them as
    adults (see Duncan O'finioan.).  Children need to look to parents as
        their main providers.  Family pride and respect does matter.

            Oprah’s multimillion-dollar school for girls, an imposing
   brick building surrounded by an electric fence which neighbors consider
   an eyesore, is perhaps a classic example of what not to do when
   interfering in the affairs of others.  Amid claims of child abuse,
   including sexual, by the school staff members, the parents have alleged
   that the school rules are too strict.  Sweets are never allowed in the
   children’s diet of only fruit, yoghurt and sandwiches.  The children
   are kept isolated from the outside world, especially family, and even
   when visits are allowed the parent may be held waiting at the security
   gate an unreasonable length of time.

   What message is given when a multimillion-dollar school is built in the
   community and then surrounded by secrecy.  Why are strangers, often
   with mental illnesses, better role models than loving mothers, fathers,
   brothers, sisters, aunts and uncles?  I can tell you bad things go on
   in schools where relatives wait at the entrance, often a long time, to
   finally be admitted.  That is what I was required to do at the
   pre-school where my grandchildren were abused.  They knew who I was.
   Why couldn’t I just walk in?

   Junk food is not a good diet.  But an occasional treat sometimes lifts
   one’s spirits, and can be nutritious.  Why did the students in Oprah’s
   school feel deprived of treats?  Could it be they were being fed a diet
   with too few calories?  I was kept hungry and cold as a child, for a
   reason.  It tends to open one up to a little thought control, a
   necessary ingredient in any re-education program.  The same maybe said
   of isolation techniques, such as limiting visits from the outside
   world.  Isn’t that just exactly what cults do?  And what is being
   taught in this school, anyway?  Is it loyalty to outsiders instead of
   their community?  This multimillion-dollar school, surrounded by
   secrecy, doesn’t seem like a good thing to me.  Is her school really
   just a Trojan horse?  I think if I lived in that community, I would ask
   Oprah to open up the school to the community and if she refused I would
   ask her to leave.

   http://www.news24.com/News24/South_Africa/News/0,9294,2-7-1442_2081757,
   00.html

   http://www.timesonline.co.uk/tol/news/world/africa/article2716668.ece

   http://www.caica.org/Oprah_Winfrey_flies_to_South_Africa_10-22-07.htm

   Mauri (11/3/07)


                            Cabbage Patch Babies

   [stork.jpg] In the state of California babies are found in the cabbage
   patch, brought perhaps by the stork. At least that is how it may be
   taught in the public schools when new bills SB777, AB 394 and AB 14,
   signed by Schwarzenegger, outlawing terms perceived as negative to
   “gays” in the public school curriculum, are implemented. No longer will
   it be socially correct to use terms such as Mon and Dad or Husband and
   Wife.  But wait a minute; even “gays” have a Mom and a Dad.  By signing
   this bill Arnold Schwarzenegger shows he is the “girlie-man.”  Just
   like the students, does that mean he can use either the ladies’ or the
   men’s bathroom?

   Is there a new hidden agenda behind this new law?  Is there a plan that
   heterosexual reproduction is about to be outlawed?  Will we all have to
   start reproducing by cloning?  Perhaps they are considering instituting
   a Nazi Germany Eugenics plan, where the state decides which eggs meet
   up with which sperm.  How did those kids turn out without a real Mom
   and Dad?  Did they win any Nobel prizes?  I wonder how many were
   sexually molested with only the state to protect them?  Will it be
   considered fair game that, since only a Mom and a Dad can make a baby,
   the baby will be removed and given to a “gay” couple to raise in their
   “gay” lifestyle?  This doesn’t sound like a religious issue to me.  It
   sounds like an attack on the family unit of biological mother, father
   and children.  It sounds like a giant step toward the death of
   humanity, no matter what lifestyle or religion you follow.

   http://www.worldnetdaily.com/news/article.asp?ARTICLE_ID=58130

    Mauri (11/1/07)



                           Nine Satanic Statements

   [Satan.jpg]

   Many occult organizations are just branches of the same tree.  Much of
   their doctrines overlap.  The Church of Satan is one of the more open
   of their sinister nature to the public.  But this is only because it
   helps them attract new members.  The following Nine Satanic Statements
   are taken from the Satanic Bible by Anton Szandor LaVey.  Judge for
   yourself if you want this philosophy practiced in your neighborhood.


   1.  Satan represents indulgences, instead of abstinence!

   2.  Satan represents vital existence, instead of spiritual pipe dreams!

   3.  Satan represents undefiled wisdom, instead of hypocritical
   self-deceit!

   4.  Satan represents kindness to those who deserve it, instead of love
   wasted on ingrates!

   5.  Satan represents vengeance, instead of turning the other check!

   6. Satan represents responsibility to the responsible, instead of
   concern for psychic vampires!

   7.  Satan represents man as just another animal, sometimes better, more
   often worse than those that walk on all-fours, who, because of his
   “divine spiritual and intellectual development,” has become the most
   vicious animal of all!

   8.  Satan represents all of the so-called sins, as they all lead to
   physical, mental, or emotional gratification!

   9.  Satan has been the best friend the church has ever had, as he has
   kept it in business all these years!

   The seven deadly sins that Statement 8 declares Satan represents are as
   follows:

   1. Lust – including adultery, bestiality and rape (especially of
   children.)

   2. Gluttony – In my experience this sin was not actually allowed
   because it leads to weight gain, which is strictly forbidden, (we only
   ate two meals a day.)  Alcohol and drugs are allowed.

   3. Greed – deliberate betrayal or treason through bribery, theft,
   robbery, violence or trickery, to gain material wealth.

   4. Sloth – including sadness, lack of enthusiasm.  In my experience
   this was not really allowed, everyone was required to be
   enthusiastically obedient, or else.

   5. Wrath – including anger, hatred, rage, assault, violence, prejudice,
   discrimination and transgressions due to vengeance including murder and
   genocide.

   6. Envy – including jealousy and malice.

   7. Pride – including vanity, arrogance, narcissism and Hubris.

   In my experience the cult I was raised in practiced Satanism along with
   Wicca, if on different occasions.  The cult members were also big
   devotees of Aleister Crowley.  All three, Satanism, Wicca and Crowley
   practitioners often are found in the same group, Crowley being a large
   influence in the doctrines of the other two.  The following is taken
   from Crowley's book Magick in Theory and Practice:

    "To attain the Grade of Magister Templi, he must perform two tasks;
   the emancipation from thought by putting each idea against its
   opposite, and refusing to prefer either; and the consecration of
   himself as a pure vehicle for the influence of the order to which he
   aspires."

   Did that quote just state what I thought?  Don't think or judge if
   something is right or wrong, just do exactly what you are told.  If you
   attain the Grade of Magister Templi do you become a "Programmed
   Zombie"?  I was wondering where all those Zombies came from.

   In the 1980s and beyond, starting with the McMartin case, the Pagans,
   the Satanists and the Wiccans all held hands condemning the pre-school
   child molestation cases as a Witch Hunt,
   ( http://www.dynionmwyn.net/lawguide/lawguide4.html).  The survivors
   (in many cases their victims) of ritual abuse were accused of having
   false memories.  According to them it was the Witches, Pagans, and
   Satanists who were the true victims, not the tiny tots.  The fact that
   these groups all stood together shows they are connected.  I think
   they  had a reason to feel threatened, their guilt!

   The philosophies these groups preach are the tools of Organized Crime.
   Thou shalt not, becomes thou will, because I say so!  Members are
   encouraged or forced to commit crimes such as rape, murder, extortion
   or any other activity that benefits those in power.  Since a true
   investigation of the secret activities of these groups would certainly
   expose them, their latest tactic has been to get the politicians to
   make it a Hate Crime when the victims speak out.  This is very close to
   taking away the publics right to own guns.  It leaves the public
   defenseless.  Do you think that speaking out against Satanism, Wicca,
   or the O.T.O. should be considered a Hate Crime?

    Mauri (10/28/07)


                      Beware of Wolves on the Internet

   [Little%20Red.jpg] In the mid 1980s the tiny tots at the McMartin
   pre-school in Manhattan Beach, California, began telling tales of
   playing a game called “Naked Movie Star.”  They described being
   photographed while they performed nude as directed.  The public
   response was that children remember the silliest things.  Then similar
   stories started to come out from all over the nation.  The stories even
   began to include Satan worship.  Why it was creating a “satanic
   panic.”  How could these stories be true, with the police and the FBI
   diligently searching everywhere and no child pornography could be
   found?  A whole organized group was quickly formed to explain this to a
   shocked public, the False Memory Syndrome Foundation.  After much
   effort the world finally returned to sanity.

   Then in the late 1990s the Internet began its world wide web.  And lo
   and behold, one of the first problems it created was the distribution
   and sale of child pornography.  Mountains of the material, the bumbling
   police and FBI could not find, was on the net.  How does the FMSF
   explain this?  “Beware, the Internet is creating sex crimes against
   children,” seems to be the explanation of choice.  “Before the Internet
   this problem did not exist.” But the fact of the matter is that the
   crimes did exist before the Internet, and on a major scale.  The
   Internet is not creating sex crimes; it is exposing them.

   Mauri (10/23/07)


                             Witches and Goblins

   [witches.jpg]

   Halloween is a bad holiday for me.  I was drown on Halloween as a small
   child by my mother and then made fun of by the witches.  But as an
   adult there are a few things about this celebration that I like.  First
   and foremost is the fact that the witches are exposed as they really
   are, ugly with warts on their faces.  Every Halloween I get even and
   make fun of the witches.

   But lately there has been a campaign to get rid of Halloween.  Children
   are no longer allowed to celebrate it at school.  Heaven forbid that
   children do anything fun at school; they might actually like going
   there.  Who wants to get rid of Halloween and why?  I can tell you it
   isn’t this ritual abuse survivor.  I think people should look at what
   goes bump in the night; this world does have evil.  The idea of the
   “witch” is ancient and is talked about in the Bible.  Witches create
   evil spells.  I can testify to you that they do.  I watched them.  It
   is the mutation of the word “witch” that makes me angry.  It means
   someone who does evil, especially to children.  It is not the women who
   were killed in the witch-hunts of the Catholic Church.  They were only
   called witches to justify their murder.  It isn’t practitioners of old
   religions.  They have their own doctrines and don’t deserve the “witch”
   link.  The witch of the Bible is there for a reason.  It is to warn
   people to beware of evil.  So who wants to get rid of Halloween?  It is
   people who want the public to ignore that warning, people who like to
   do magick and create evil spells that usually include the victimization
   of someone, often a child.  It is the witches themselves that are on a
   campaign to get rid of the public celebration of “their” holiday.  They
   have put out a media blitz in books, on television and the movies that
   “witches” are good, beautiful beings with special powers.  I don’t
   object to fantasy stories as long as they have a moral message.  But
   the witch worshipping stories seem to focus more on power, greed, and
   humiliation, most often through spells, which is cheating.  And now to
   get rid of their true warty image, the witches are on a mission to wipe
   out the public celebration of Halloween.  (Guess what, Christmas is
   going too.)

   Mauri (10/19/07)



                             Top of the Pyramid

               Anyone who reads my biography and essays knows that the top
      of the satanic pyramid that I saw was the Vatican.  As I briefly
   researched the history and doctrines of the Catholic Church, it struck
   me that the organization was far more concerned with empire than saving
   souls. A crime against God was of less concern than a crime against the
      Mother Church.  Tolerance was never the rule.  Less than obedient
      Catholics and those following any other faith could be labeled as
     heretics, whom may be killed.  This is a problem with doctrine and
    needs to be addressed.  It really is a crime against humanity to kill
   some one because they don’t agree, especially in areas that amount to
   simple belief.  What gives the Church the right to kill for a “thought
            crime”?  That doesn’t seem very Christian to me.

   The Catholic Church has a worldwide network of enforcers whose sense of
   morality may vary greatly. History reveals much that is good by Church
   members.  It also reveals much that is bad. Members and non-members
   alike continually uncover Church abuse.  I’m not suggesting that the
   solution is to expel the Jesuits or even the Catholic Church because
   that wouldn’t solve the problem.  It would also defeat my argument that
   people have a right to freedom of religion.  Further, it has been tried
   and hasn’t worked in the past.  The ugly network created by the
   international bankers and cartels, and likely started and financed
   originally by the Catholic Church with its worldwide army of priests
   and nuns, has taken on a life of its own.  I think the Church will even
   take a fall for a one-world religion that they think they will run.
   It really is more about power than doctrine.  The New World Order is
   the final realization of an ancient quest, global rule.  Cut off what I
   saw as the head and this hydra will grow a new head.  I was raised as a
   part of the network created by this satanic movement.  It is based on
   terror and mind control from the inside out. By the creation of
   programmed zombies, marching in lock step toward the final solution,
   the corruption and downfall of mankind, global rule becomes a reality.
   If this comes to fruition, it can only happen by wiping the Earth clean
   of God’s beauty and glory.  If they achieve their goal they will rule a
   very ugly place.  Once the killing starts, it becomes unstoppable.  You
   may be sure the environment, the animals, and even the global elite
   themselves will be next.

   What is the lesson? People don’t survive long when they abandon
   morality.  We live in groups.  We survive because we help one another.
   The end does not justify the means.  There is no end.  Judgment will be
   on the means.  Anyone who participates at a decision-making level for
   the organized crime these globalists have created needs to be held
   responsible.  No one should be exempt.  It isn’t who you are, but what
   you have done that counts.

   Mauri (10/17/07)


                            700 year Anniversary


   [knight_templar.jpg] Today is the 700-year anniversary of the first
   international banking scandal. Friday the 13^th, 1307, the Vatican
   publicly aired its dirty laundry by arresting the Knights Templar.
   What was the complaint about?  Why it was about the love of money, the
   root of all evil.  One group had it and the other group wanted it.  For
   seven hundred years this battle has continued, the idea being he who
   controls international banking controls the world.  The clear loser, as
   the money passed back and forth between elite hands, has been the
   people.

   With the collapse of the dollar, we will all have less money with which
   to party.  But no matter, I suggest we celebrate by supporting Ron Paul
   in his quest to set up a financial system that actually serves “We the
   People.”  Let’s all join in the fight to get rid of the private,
   globalist-banking system that is the Federal Reserve and not continue
   this insanity to 800 years.

             International banking may build the magnificent structures of
   empire, but it also funds crimes against humanity.  I personally prefer
   a little less of man’s crumbling creations, and a bit more of God’s
   self-renewing glory. Maybe the time is right to think small.

    Mauri  (10/13/07)


                                 Never Again

               The only way “Never Again” can become reality is if those
   who orchestrate holocausts have their chest boards, Kings, Queens and
   pawns removed, permanently.  The holocaust brewing in Israel today
   begins with a land grab.  It doesn’t really matter which side is
   displaced, Arab or Israeli, in come the bulldozers and someone’s home
   and possessions are mowed under.  Each blames the other for their
   agony, as the real evildoers sit behind closed doors and snicker.
   Again, it is all the smiling famous faces, who hold international
   meetings, then claim they are working day and night to solve the
   Israeli, Palestinian problem.  I think the Bible says something about
   fruit.  If these exalted saviors are to be known by their fruit, and
   not what they speak with forked tongue, then why haven’t both the
   Israelis and the Palestinians kicked these bums out?

   According to Barry Chamish, http://www.thebarrychamishwebsite.com,
   Nadia Matar, leader of The Women in Green, was arrested for leading a
   protest march September 19th.  Matar told Israel National TV, "The
   Prime Minister and Condoleezza Rice are planning, in a secret manner,
   to give away Judea, Samaria and the Temple Mount and the establishment
   a Palestinian Nazi State there. The public has learned that we were
   much too delicate last time. We will not allow it this time. We will
   not obey and we will not stand down in the face of this treachery."

   My personal opinion is that the CFR is planning a Nazi State all right;
   forget the Palestinian part.  It’s simple, the little people want
   communities that function.  The real international terrorists, the
   globalists, want the land.  If there was any real intention of serving
   local communities, why bulldoze?  Why not sell the structures when the
   land is turned over to the Palestinians.  The only reason to turn
   houses into rubble is that the intention is that no one will be allowed
   to make their home there.  All will be herded into the cities turned
   ghettos.

   Israel is the canary in the N.W.O. mine.   Just as they are reducing
   the areas the Israelis may live on, so are they doing this to the rest
   of the world.  When we are in an area too small to defend the trap will
   snap.  You either need no Israel or an Israel that can defend itself.
   It is morally indefensible to put the survivors of the holocaust on a
   tiny piece of land no one can defend.  After 1948 Israel added land to
   its borders until it became almost large enough to defend as a
   country.  With the added land mass new waves of immigrants were
   encouraged to come.  Now the trap is being sprung, the rope tightening
   as the immigrants are being driven from the land and into the cities,
   the land shrinking back to its original indefensible position.  These
   world leader aren’t smart, they are evil.  One of the reasons they get
   away with what they do is that most people have no frame of reference
   to even imagine such evil.

   As time flows backward for Israel and she is moved toward her 1949
   borders, she must shudder at what went before, the ghetto.  When they
   herd us into the cities they are creating a ghetto, a place where we
   can’t supply our own needs for survival.  We can’t grow food or even
   manufacture what we need.  And where did the Jews go from the ghetto?
   They were transported by train to the concentration camps.  And where
   did they go next?  Most went to heaven.  Is that our destiny?  If they
   get away with it in Israel, why wouldn’t they get away with it in the
   rest of the world?

    After the N.W.O. has the world’s population in ghettos.  Population
   reduction becomes a snap.

    1.  Don’t let food or water in and starve the population to death.

   2.  Drop bombs and kill millions with limited impact to the total land
   mass.

   3. Contaminate with lethal disease organisms or toxic chemicals.
   Population has nowhere to hide.

   4. Incite riots so different factions fight each other.

   5. Send in a brutal armed force of psychopathic killers.

   6. All of the above and much, much more limited only by the
   imagination.


   I said they were evil, didn’t I?

    Mauri  (10/8/07)


                            The Environmentalist

                       The Satanists in my family introduced me to
   environmentalism.  Because I loved the solitude of nature and wanted to
     preserve clean water, clean air and the trees, I joined the Sierra
   Club.  Want to know what all those Satanists are doing on the trails of
    our parks and wilderness?  Better be careful when you go hiking, you
                            might just find out.

   Not everything I learned from the Satanists do I consider bad.  They
   live the simple life, worshipping natural fibers and organic food. I
   have no argument with that, except the worship part. They support the
   UN by the way, and work for UNESCO and UNICEF in saving education,
   science, culture and the children.  Needless to say they are big
   environmentalists most interested in population reduction.  Sometimes
   when the moon is brightly shinning and high in the sky they even make
   their own contribution to reducing the human plague. After all,
   according to the CIA’s and the UN’s own figures the world’s population
   is exploding out of control, and China is the leading offender.

   28 years of China’s one child policy, especially when most are boys,
   should have at least begun to reduce China’s population by now.  Lets
   see, one child per couple, with 120 boys for every 100 girls, that adds
   up to about a 45% replacement rate every generation (about 25 years),
   as one child replaces two parents and four grandparents, with an
   additional 10% die out of lines because the one child is a male that
   can’t find a bride.   A century of the worst genocide the world has
   known, and still the world’s population keeps growing out of control?
   You can even hear the numbers click away at the world population
   counter at the Zoo.  I believe in population control.  I have no desire
   to starve.  I know how hunger feels.  I love the trees and wild places
   and think they need protection. But, something about the United
   Nations' and the CIA’s figures about population just do not add up.  I
   am told that everyone in China doesn’t follow the one child rule, some
   have two, but by their own figures the country as a whole does not have
   a 100% replacement rate, and yet the projection is that China’s
   population will continue to climb.  Where are these additional Chinese
   coming from?  Are the population figures cooked up by the CIA and UN as
   another part of their witches-brew of lies? Click, click, click goes
   the counter and with it visions of people multiplying out of control,
   over running the savannas, the deserts, the cities, until they finally
   reach you, fowling the land, the air and the water and eating
   everything in their path as they go.  I must admit their propaganda
   paints a frightening picture and strikes at one’s own sense of
   survival.  But now when I pass the clicking counter I have begun to
   question its God-like validity.  Once I’ve been lied to its hard to
   trust the CIA’s and UN’s “scientific” figures again.

   I think this is a modern version of a very old trick, instead of over
   running our land with solders and killing us off to take what we have,
   they are over running us with propaganda to get us to wipe ourselves
   out so that they can steal what we leave. They herd us together in
   cities by hijacking the economy then re-locating it in only a few
   places.  We become dependent and therefore easier to control.  Like
   rats in a crowded cage, wallowing in our own filth and breathing cement
   dust, the wall-to-wall people of their mega cities convince us we are
   reproducing out of control and some of us need to go. But that is just
   how the Satanists mind control works.  They tell you the reality they
   want you to have, and then they reinforce that reality with illusion.
   The truth behind the illusion in this case just might be that the
   population isn’t skyrocketing, but that the world we are allowed to
   live on is severely shrinking.  If they take all our land then the
   gigantic cities we are forced to move to are over crowded.  And as even
   more people are forced off the land and into those cities, it is
   getting worse every day.

   Nothing has proved to be more polluting and irresponsible than big, big
   manufacturing, big, big crowded cities and big, big agribusiness.
   Shipping goods all over the world must be a major drain on limited
   energy resources, not to mention a significant contributor to CO[2].
   Maintaining the present agenda of endless wars robs more resources from
   the earth and future generations, and further pollutes the land we all
   share. Global businesses become gigantic by Mafia tactics. I say bring
   back the family farm, mom and pop businesses, and smaller mixed use
   communities. Mom and Pop go to church on Sunday, live in the community
   and have a sense of morality.  Perhaps it is time for the little people
   to unite and save the environment by taking back the world.  Perhaps it
   is time to think local and small.

   Mauri (10/6/07)


                                    FMSF

               What does the False Memory Syndrome Foundation have in
   common with Scientific American?  The answer is Martin Gardner.  But
   the similarity doesn’t end there.  Both are very influential in our
   hallowed halls of education.  Another esteemed member of FMSF is Louis
   Jolyon West, M. D. UCLA School of Medicine, Los Angeles, CA, according
   to Dick Farley and posted by Alex Constantine Sept. 28, 2007.  West’s
   ties to the CIA funded MKULTRA program is beyond any reasonable doubt.
   Much research has been done on this subject and can be found all over
   the web.  My interest is in Martin Gardner, also on the above-mentioned
   list of FMSF members.

   Martin Gardner wrote a column for Scientific American from 1956 to 1981
   called “Mathematical Games.”  He was a major contributor to twentieth
   century thought publishing over 60 books, according to Wikipedia.  Most
   attacked what he called fringe science.  But a couple showed an
   interesting fascination with fiction works universally reported in mind
   control programming.  This included “The Annotated Alice” (1960) based
   on the works of Lewis Carroll, “Alice’s Adventures in Wonderland” and
   “Through the Looking Glass” and “The Wizard of Oz and Who He Was”
   (1957) based on the children’s classic “The Wizard of Oz”.

   I read Scientific American for years, to put me to sleep at night.
   That is I read it until I started to have nightmares.  The articles
   moved in a direction that was distinctly disturbing.  Science was being
   done in an extremely vicious and cruel manner and then on top of the
   pile of abused, and sacrificed animals, some of their conclusions made
   no sense.  But reading their articles did give me an education.  The
   physics they were pushing, Quantum Mechanics, had to be wrong because
   it was breaking conservation laws right and left.  Some of the articles
   seemed magickal and even silly. The articles were often in lock step
   and presented only one side of life’s mysterious questions.  There was
   no controversy, all agreed; at least they did if they wanted to get
   published.

   If the CIA is a major player in the goings on of the FMSF, I wonder
   what the CIA’s influence is across town at Scientific American.

    Mauri  (10/4/07)


                            Politically Incorrect

   This article may offend you, well, because it is politically
   incorrect.  Maybe a few “hate crime” laws could put an end to my
   chatter.  But, before that happens there are a few things that have
   been going on that I just don’t understand. For example, when I pressed
   a link “very creepy, disturbing children’s cartoon, banned from TV,” a
   scene from “The Adventures of Mark Twain” loosely taken from Mark
   Twain’s writing and set in Claymation, began.  I remembered the movie
   as I had watched it over and over with my grandchildren many years
   ago.  The story line was classic Mark Twain, thought provoking.  I was
   touched by the little clay figures, and thought it clever when in the
   movie they switched from the clay figures and photographed a human arm
   and hand to represent God.  I like story lines that include a spectrum
   of characters, including evil.  At least the fallen angle, Satan, in
   the Claymation clip owned up to that fact.  As a child, who dealt with
   evil on a regular basis, I would have been as drawn to the clip, as I
   am today.  The most evil people I knew thought they were Good and
   working for God, True Believers.  To this day no behavior is more
   frightening to me than that.  I must admit I have never seen a movie
   banned because it was scary.

   Why Mark Twain has been totally and effectively censored from libraries
   and schools is an act beyond comprehension.  If the “Politically
   Correct” get their way “The Adventures of Huckleberry Finn,” (1885)
   will be no more.  The word “nigger” is a part of American history, and
   the appropriate use of the word shouldn’t ban anything.  Jim, the
   runaway slave, was the most rational character in the story.  And Huck
   made the morale decision to go to hell rather than turn in his friend.
   I think that words are being used as an excuse to get rid of a
   political point of view.  The same is true with sex, which in the end
   never censors sex, but sensors one’s political opposition instead.

   “Amos and Andy” was one of my favorite radio programs way back when. I
   listened to it religiously as a child.  They were funny in a way
   similar to the later produced television show “I Love Lucy.”  Today
   “Amos and Andy” is considered politically incorrect.  Why?  The movie
   “Dumbo” suffers a similar fate. I make no apologies for one of the
   heroes of the animation, the Crows.  Without them there would not have
   been a happy ending.  The villains of the movie were the pasty-faced
   clowns, evil to the core, just the way I remember clowns.  The hero
   Crows were black, the sicko, dumb clowns were white.  Perhaps the white
   community should complain.

   Some of the most aw inspiring and beautiful music ever written were the
   Negro spirituals. I used to listen to them on the radio.  Now the only
   music on radio representing the Black Community is Gangstra RAP.  The
   soul music of the past is no more, except perhaps in a few church
   pews.  What is America becoming?  What gets media coverage, black
   athletes who murder family members, electrocute dogs, and rape
   strangers, black artists that sing about killing cops and raping hoes.
   How do these criminals represent the Black Community?     And the
   gifted black artist, dripping with talent can’t find a stage on which
   to perform. The worst part is if you complain, the media talking heads
   say that is what the public demands.  No, that is what the Elite
   demands!  I personally would be very suspicious of anything those
   cockroaches say or do.  By the use of censorship, black history is
   being wiped out.  If they are not careful, they may join the ranks of
   the Jews with their holocaust deniers.  A bit more censorship and time
   becomes ripe for the slavery deniers.

   It isn’t just Black history that is under the gun.  Take the case of
   the movie classic the “African Queen.” You know the famous 1951 classic
   where Humphrey Bogart and Katharine Hepburn fight the Nazis. This great
   classic can only be found as a foreign, probably bootlegged, DVD.  I
   feel a definite elite hand out there scratching away at our history. I
   guess it is harder to repeat history if people know the history, so
   perhaps in their mind it must go.

   As a woman trying to survive with a weak safety net and little support,
   I find I have a preference for men in the leadership role, again
   politically incorrect.  I want a few women there to represent my
   gender, but not too many.  I also find I tend to support a mother’s
   presents as the dominant caretaker of her children.  Such old fashioned
   ideas but try as I may I don’t feel comfortable getting rid of them.
   You may be sure that one of reasons I won’t be voting for Hilary
   Clinton is because she is a woman (another is because she is a witch.)
   But perhaps I can’t really be blamed for my feelings, as they are
   likely as old as the Savanna where early man hunted and early woman
   gathered.  He and his buddies brought home the game and because it
   might spoil, shared it with the entire community, while she likely fed
   her immediate family first with her small bounty. He was big and burly,
   more fit for battle, while she spent a significant part of her life in
   the menstrual hut, or weighted down with a big belly or nursing child.
   I don’t think women are fit for battle physically or psychologically.
   Women fight individually in defense of their children, men fight in a
   group in defense of the community, there is a difference.  A stereotype
   often used by women’s liberation why they should dominate the body
   politic is that women are more moral than men.  With a woman in charge
   wars would end.  When has that ever happened?   A sense of morality is
   neither masculine nor feminine but is found in any group on an
   individual basis.

   Mauri  9/29/07


                            Movies and Television

              Nothing mesmerizes the mind like the big screen.  Add a good
   dose of rhythm with a sound tract that jumps and the audience becomes a
   captive slave.  I remember the euphoria of the hard candies and the
   chocolate covered ice cream drops adding another of the five senses to
   the moment.  Who controlled Hollywood controlled the world.  And for
   almost a century Hollywood was King.

               But who did control Hollywood and later Television?  Big
   money tends to come from places where big crimes have occurred.  One
   must assume the big productions had some pretty unsavory financial
   backers.  And if one looks closely at the scripts of many of these
   movies there was a New World Order agenda afoot, such as woman’s
   liberation and the breakup of the family.  The feminine lead was often
   made unreal beneath a pound of make-up and padded bosoms.  Some moved
   like beta-sex-slaves, and maybe they were. Even occult themes crept
   into many a story line.  From personal experience I know some Hollywood
   figures were targeted for control, as I was used in sex trafficking to
   them in devious plans of blackmail.  I never liked the stars I met at
   Jack Parsons’ place, and felt squishy watching their films.  Nothing
   like a sour sex encounter to sour the mind against a face, and when
   that face is made gigantic on the big screen the effect is made
   gigantic also.  But the evil of the media is not really what I want to
   focus on.  Just letting the reader know I know it is there.

               I was raised in a satanic cult where the goal, should I
   survive, was that I worship evil.  This is a highly painful view of the
   world.  Like many teenagers I turned to the movies and television for
   better role models.  It wasn’t hard to find them.  “I Love Lucy” was
   one of my favorites.  She was real, she was funny, and she was flawed
   but basically moral and a good human being.  The story lines will
   probably remain relevant and humorous throughout time.  The big screen
   influenced my thinking also, especially productions featuring Doris
   Day.  I know!  Don’t say or think it!  These musical extravaganzas
   greatly improved my view of the human species.  And believe me my
   world-view needed improvement.  When human compassion, loyalty,
   bravery, honesty are shown on the big screen, it is an uplifting
   experience.  When I watch these old movies on my little 5-inch screen,
   it is no less uplifting.  As the story lines in the movies and on
   television begin to reflect more and more the world-view of the few
   corporations that own everything, featuring an abundance of sex and
   violence, a disrespect for the rule of law and the common man, as the
   content becomes closer and closer to the ideals of the satanic cult I
   was raised in, I have begun to purchase on DVDs the fantasy world of my
   choice, where humor, morality and joy are king once again.

               Perhaps if we turned off the Television and boycotted their
   low-class D minus movies featuring gratuitous sex and violence, we
   could dry up a little of the money of these evil corporations that have
   seized almost total control of our media.  Perhaps if we supported
   smaller, independent productions focusing on high-class, thought
   provoking story lines, we could begin to support a world worth living
   in. And while we are at it perhaps we could also support the
   independent musician who creates beautiful works that inspire.  The
   technology is here to give us an independent choice, if only we make
   use of it.   Don’t ever under estimate the power of music and the film.

    Mauri   (9/22/07)



                            Who Controls Science?

              The gurus of science generally make their home in the
   institutions of higher learning.  But does an even greater authority
   beyond the ivy-covered halls control these professors?  Why yes.  It’s
   called “publish or perish.”  Then the really scary question is who
   controls the Scientific Journals.  By their silence on the science
   behind 911, surely some very powerful and organized group does.  Is
   this something new, or has it a long subtle history that no one
   noticed, unless of course they were trying to publish material not
   “powerful and organized group” approved.  Two areas peaked the
   interests of those who would control the world, physics and
   psychology.  Today there is only one approved view of the Universe and
   it is through the strange and often unscientific and illogical theories
   of Quantum Mechanics, pushed to the head of the line by such
   prestigious Journals as Scientific American.  For a theory that led
   directly to Magick, predicting such things as free energy which breaks
   the law of the conservation of energy, Quantum Mechanics was at first
   strangely popular and then the only theory allowed.  I watched as
   logical and beautiful ideas on the Universe deteriorated into a
   religion, which based its ideas on its own myth, certainly not
   scientific principles.  This new religion even told us which
   practitioners to worship, as their intellect was described as light
   years beyond the rest of society.  They welded an almost God-like
   persona, quite a feat for theories unproven.  I challenge the so-called
   Scientific Journals to address the physics of 911, and while they are
   at it also address competing theories in physics to Quantum Mechanics,
   such as the “Particle as a Photon Moving in a Circle” that they buried
   almost a half century ago.

   When the hallowed Scientific Publishing monopoly prints only the
   arguments that advance their agenda, how can we trust such a
   “science”?  How can we read what they say and then vote for solutions
   to the problems of pollution, global warming and the environment?  If
   we can’t trust them on 911, then how can we trust them at all?

   Mauri  (9/1/07)


                          The Lion Stalks the Lamb

            I don’t really care much for guns.  Perhaps my childhood
   satisfied my curiosity about violence for many lifetimes.  As a child I
 did shoot tin cans in the desert with my father’s 22, so I’m not really
   afraid of guns.  But I prefer they are kept out of sight.  On the other
    side of the gun issue, I am a huge believer in the right of any human
     being to defend one’s self.  In the real world, in that moment of
   predation one is usually alone.  The police may solve the crime later,
    but generally they do not prevent the crime.  I see the gun issue as
     one option in the right to self-defense; probably it also acts as a
      deterrent.  The body politic, sweat running down their brows, are
   trying to convince the public to turn in their guns to be replaced with
   cameras, personal data files, records on finger prints, the iris of the
        eye and DNA. Even personal money transactions for such simple
   necessities as food are recorded. How does this protect the public from
      crime you ask, especially if the cameras are turned off when the
      predator is a public official?  It doesn’t.  Cameras, files and
    personal data theft are the classical tools of the STALKER.  Why does
   the government want to stalk its own citizens?  Why does the lion stalk
                                  the lamb?

   Mauri  (9/1/07)


                           Revenge of the Sheeple

          Life is tough.  Since the beginning of time, survival has never
   been easy.  Oh that we could just close our eyes and wish for a better
    world.  And because we surely deserve such a world it would magically
    come into being.  A nice idea, but it has no nuts and bolts.  And the
     world is held together by nuts and bolts.  Getting rid of a system,
    even a very evil system, creates a void.  If the dollar collapses and
   we kick out the private bankers and get rid of the Federal Reserve, the
   dollar must be replaced with some new means of exchange.  If we banish
    the corrupt corporations to little islands, we must find a new source
      of goods.  And because we didn’t respect or support Mom and Pop
   businesses, but let them get eaten, we would have to start from scratch
     building stuff, and all by ourselves, with no Lioness teat.  Are we
     ready?  I think that we better get ready because the Lions are now
   planning a feast, with the sheeple as the main course.  It appears that
   we have no choice.  Americans have a history of challenge.  I think we
                             are up to the task.

        Money is the root of all evil and so it is the most logical place
   to begin.  We really haven’t had to think about money for generations,
   because we gratefully let the wealthy Lion criminals run the show.  We
   even willingly moved from place to place, breaking family ties, to work
   for their corporations.  If we kick out the Lions and the sheeple run
   the show, maybe it is time to take a closer look at how we want the
   systems that distribute the wealth to work.  Oh, I see a fight
   brewing.  Perhaps we should first look at a little economic theory.
   Communism seems to break down in groups larger than the family or small
   community, probably because the power ends up in too few hands.  Any
   system that doesn’t result in a fair and equitable distribution must be
   considered a failure.  I personally like the idea of barter, with a
   money system based on one’s labor (creativity etc.)  Currency backed by
   precious metals, while it might stop inflation, has resulted in wars,
   gouging holes in the earth, murders, intrigues and endless other
   non-productive activities.  Besides, it is unlikely by the time we get
   America back she will have any gold left.  The Lions worship gold and
   silver and so it will likely all be hidden in secret places known only
   to them. Ha, ha, ha, when they die they can’t take it with them.  Only
   good deeds may be taken to heaven.  In heaven the Lions will be poor.
   But the sheeple on earth will also be poor if they think someone else
   should take care of them. Free market systems work well, as does
   science, and almost every other activity in a society that places a
   high value on ethics and morality.  The main problem with our society
   today is that we worship money, the root of all evil.  It’s no wonder
   things are rapidly falling apart.

        This little lamb doesn’t have the answers, except on one point I’m
   sure is true.  We must begin a dialogue about possibilities for our
   local little part of the Earth.  It’s one thing to start a revolution,
   but what happens if you win?  I believe in diversity and freedom.  God
   loves variety; just look around you if you doubt that is true.  In my
   perfect world the destiny of every part of the globe would be decided
   by the local people.  We could all learn from each other, see what
   works and what doesn’t.  I definitely want to take back my country
   without shedding a drop of blood, but I think we will all be stopped in
   our tracks if we don’t have a clear idea of what to do after the fall.
   We need to develop a clear vision of how we want to re-build.
   Otherwise it’s “Oh My God, the dollar is about to collapse!”  That is
   horrible, but you can’t get rid of their fiat money and the Lions, and
   their corporations and their private banks and the evil until it does.

    Mauri  (9/23/07)

   [rant%202.jpg]


                   Essays Continued on From My Perspective





                       Copyright 2004 - 2013 by Mauri
